Step 1. Create a Product Line Metrics Matrix – include relevant business and market metrics including market share, growth, % of revenue etc. (see below)
From my observations, of the hand-shake/clasps,pounds,fives I saw it was fifty-fifty between last minute sudden clasps and runners deliberate honing in on the supportive hand like a targeted missile.
The auditions consisted of the actors recording various lines of dialogue, either lines plucked directly from the script, or variations perhaps intended to evoke a particular vibe or type of delivery. My story features both military and civilian characters, and Jay supplied me with a few different actors’ takes on various characters. While a few didn’t work for me at all, a handful really knocked my socks off. One voice actor in particular, who read lines for at least three different characters, knocked it out of the park, so far as I’m concerned. I compiled a list of my gut reactions to each audio sample, and sent that on to Jay for review.
2-The plot was crazy, and also really really dumb.
Trailheads on Google Maps
As per Newton’s third law, the rod has to react to the force of the springs. This passes back from the rocker to the mount on the wishbone. In pushrods case, this reaction force is in the opposite direction to the force fed from the wheel into the chassis, the two offset each other. With Pullrod the force from the rod and the wheel act in the same direction, this doubles the load in the upper wishbone and resultantly in the mounting the gearbox. This can be accounted for design and weight of the final wishbone design. However Pushrod also has its structural problem, the pushrod when the suspension in in bump (wheel rising) the rod is in compression and would tend to bow outwards. The pushrod was the first suspension component to have carbon fibre cladding for reinforcement, again design and weight is needed to offset this load. Suspension experts point out that Pull rod suffers similar compression bending when the suspension is in droop (wheels falling), but droop is considered less critical in wheel control, than bump. There’s no one answer to which is best, you look at your design requirements and pick which solution works, best. Next year the best car is not necessarily going to be the one with Pullrod rear suspension.
Beyond tailor’s measure lies quiet, secret measure.
where the minerals in the water had solidified on branches and twigs and stones, giving them a hard casing. We concluded that it might be calcium carbonate (like the stuff that gunks up the kettle), but haven't looked into it yet. I'm thinking of putting some vinegar on it to see if it dissolves, but at the moment the mummified branch is sticking out of my jar of oversized kitchen implements. (We don't do houseproud.)
It is now almost 6:00 am and I am starting to feel my back tightening up.
I officially put our veggie patch to bed this past weekend. I’ve left a few bits and pieces—like the kale in this picture—that seem to tolerate the frost we’ve been experiencing. It’s been a great year for our garden and it was satisfying to dig in the dead tomato plants and broccoli and even the disappointing eggplant that only just started to flower in the last month. I spent the time thinking about all the great meals we had from the garden (and continue to have with the tomatoes—both green and red), plus all the stuff I learned about growing both from trial and error, as well as the wisdom of our neighbourhood Garden Guru. I’m saving seeds and already planning next year’s fun.
Anyway, let’s just talk about the roomies instead. They are far more interesting. Jae Ha and Hang Ah shares the same room now. Looking at things, Jae Ha is more of the girl here. Hang Ah noticed that he has more beauty products than hers. They aren’t going to be close and I love it this way for now! Jae Ha teasing Hang Ah seems to make him happy so their dynamics is fun to watch. I hate that I have a blind spot for Seung Gi.
The second friendship I happily set aside last year. The person in question proved themselves to be dishonest, untrustworthy and unreliable.
I asked her why she came back to join us after Icarus Canto had rescued her, and her painted smile seemed to spread wider.
There was a child who I taught when I was first a teacher who was so shy she couldn’t even say her name when I called the register, she would just raise her hand with her head down. I noticed one time in assembly when we were singing that she had a beautiful voice and so at the first parents evening I suggested to her mum that she try to get her to come to my drama club. Eventually after a lot of persuading she came along and although it took over a year before she’d sing in front of the others she is now 21 and has just finished a degree in performing arts. We are still very close and she definitely inspired Phoebe but I had similar situations myself. When I emigrated to Israel for example, I became chronically shy and really lost my voice in a way. So many children do ‘lose their voices’ for a whole number of reasons and it’s so important they find a way to be heard.
I always say she's the control freak. Maybe it's me.
Honestly, I have no idea how it happened. First there was a loud popping sound, then out of nowhere half of a melted candle was soaking into our bedroom carpet. Half is also not an exaggeration. Did I mention the candle was purple? It was purple.
Differences in cognitive, social or whatever behaviour reflect our adaptation to our environments. Adaptation is precisely the reason why expecting multilinguals to behave like monolinguals, or forcing them to do so, is unnatural. I’ve said this time and again in this blog. So I fail to see why we should strive to achieve the converse, and turn monolinguals into multilinguals, in order to “enhance” their quality of life. Introducing multilingualism for its own sake in a monolingual community, for example, isn’t likely to “benefit” either multilingualism or the community.
You know, I always hear this bit about what would happen to the schools if we took all the Christian children or good children out? I never had a good response for it, other than to say, "what are the schools doing to your child "missionaries"?" Then today my friend pointed me to this article. Here is the answer!
(ii) the trader also has the combined mark comprising graphic device and word mark registered as a Community trade mark?
Sept 17 – Opera House – Toronto, ON (W/Valencia)
- Pretty colorways
Examples include: “Old Tom Gin”, “Classic/Old School Gin” and “American Gin/New Western/New World/Modern/Contemporary/New Age/21st Century Gin”.
I've talked to a lot of young parents considering alternative education of some sort or another, not necessarily unschooling, and to people who plan on teaching their children, a common enthusiasm expressed is that they'll be able to teach their children to love what they love. Usually the thing they're talking about is "classic" something or other, especially literature. Sometimes it's even put as baldly as that, though often that simply seems to be an underlying theme in what they're saying. I don't point it out, though sometimes I consider doing so. It doesn't seem particularly nice to say that all their dreams of creating children who share their interests isn't necessarily going to happen, and I figure it's something people will figure out themselves soon enough. But I always kind of shake my head a bit, internally. Trying to make someone else like the same things you like is likely to lead to them having little interest in the subject being pushed, at best, and actively disliking and resenting both the subject being pushed and the person pushing it, at worst.
Friction Brewing
He thought for a few minutes. Still using his angry clipped words he said sounding both flabbergasted and sarcastic:
Leadership is also misunderstood to mean directing and instructing people and making important decisions on behalf of an organization. Yes, leaders make decisions. Yes, leaders instruct and teach. However, effective leadership involves much more than these.
Hina Sabir was a charming, cheerful and stylish girl of 14 with pleasing manners. She was so caring and loving that every one small or big was attracted towards her.
There were signs, faces painted and school spirit evident from every seat in every section in the upper level.
"As leading representatives of business, we rely on the rules-based international trade framework and its supporters to sustain economic growth, employment, innovation and prosperity. We will work hard to encourage governments, including the U.K. government, to reflect in what they do the importance of the rules based international system."
Water supply is an issue on the Gospel Trail. Since it avoids many towns, water access is off route much of the way. This means hikers have to carry an extra 10-20 lbs of water with them to prevent dehydration. Hikers die from dehydration every year in Israel.
#2: The longest part of this whole project was the cleaning/editing/purging part. The elfa system is actually insanely easy to install and I was able to do that part of it in 1 Sunday afternoon. The non-fun purging part took much longer.
My last post I told you about the summer-like conditions here in Sitges. Well I must have jinxed it, because the next day these strange-looking white and grey fluffy things started crowding out the blue sphere which is virtually all I’ve known for the last 8 months. Since we’ve been here I could count on two hands the number of days we’ve had rainy skies. Apparently it is not always quite this dry. In fact this is the driest winter in Spain in the past 70 years.
Our discussions changed, slightly, again to another aspect of literature. This specifically had to do with the idea of Language Poetry. Now I have already stated in a previous post of my dislike for this so-called “important literary movement.” Admittedly, that didn’t change in his conversation. We fully believe that it is a movement, lead by professors, as a sort of mental masturbation. The idea that not waiting for others to validate your ideas is all well and good; playing around with literature is all well and good; but to deny the importance of literary history, to deny the importance of the personal context is completely unforgiveable. I’m directing this specifically to those following the practice of “intellectual plagiarism” and the like. Language Poetry has, in essence, spoken more about freedom, is more about freedom, to do whatever you like – backed up with the name-drop (Ashbery – Yes, I’m fucking calling out that talentless hack!). Without some deeper context, personal context to each piece of literature, the more dry and boring it becomes. Humor is now a major focus on the literary scene, but why? I asked this to Lopez and he gave me the same answer I’ve been giving myself: “I don’t know.”
Apparently if someone (him) is in danger - you are allowed to do a Safety Tattle.
Muffled, we drove through.~
You thought this was going somewhere, didn't you?
The lettuce must love its spot in the garden because I've been able to harvest five times since I planted. The crisp, tender leaves taste best sprinkled with a little fleur de sel and a whisper of vinaigrette. This evening I added a few tiny tomatoes, a perfect complement to the delicate leaves.
And then there were nine and eight and ….
The volume of our gray matter normally reduces as we get older and this is what the scientists found in the group of non-meditators. But for the meditators, their gray matter hadn’t reduced at all with age. According to the scientists, meditation had a ‘neuroprotective’ effect on the meditators: It protected the brain from some of the effects of aging.
I cant wait to see its little lips and toes, and snuggle with that sweet babe ! It seems lately it's all I ever think about. God is good and we are daily thanking Him for this new gift .
stained with moss.
No matter what my children say, I'll still take the pictures and I still enjoy those short moments in the day when I stop dead in my tracks and say Yes!
May the sun be shinning on your day today...xxx
24 dill pickle slices
"I dunno man, you might wanna check out an army surplus-"
6 Man on the Run
When I tell people how passionately I love this book, I’m often met with mocking lines from the film, and that’s a shame. Gone With the Wind is so much more than the movie lets on. Scarlett O’Hara is an anti-heroine, a woman who was prepared by her parents for a way of life that was utterly destroyed by the Civil War. Tough and determined, Scarlett literally scrapes a living up from the ashes and supports everyone she loves by whatever means necessary. Ultimately, however, she sacrifices her very ability to love others, because she’s too terrified to open up and trust again. There is so much in this story that is meaningful for our time, and the characters are absolutely incredible. Don’t let the movie put you off, don’t let the length of the book intimidate you, just read it. (And before a flame-war begins: yes, I am well-aware of the racism in this book. It wasn’t included to endorse racism, it was included to illustrate what actually happened in that time.)
A few recent threads and conversations in my social network has got me thinking about parties, potlucks, and events. Specifically, the logistics of executing hosting tasks in a fairly tasteful, fun, and drama-free manner. As we move into the wedding/party season of late spring and summer, many brides and party hosts are dealing with these issues:
Last Monday, Facebook email saying "I'm coming to your gig on Thursday !"
I actually did a really adorable bun this weekend...and didn't take not. one. picture. I was so excited about it that the next morning I set up my Mac to do a video tutorial for you lovelies...and couldn't reproduce the style for the life of me. For my own sake, I went to YouTube and found this fabulous tutorial, which does it better than I ever could anyway. Enjoy!
- Chicken stock/broth
I found it helpful to have these various spare keys squirreled away, especially when I locked myself out of my house, or, more troubling, locked my mother in.
On a recent drive with a young leader I noticed how he’s learned to talk less and listen more. He’s able to hold his tongue, something few can do. I admire his growth.
Significantly, and against all expectations, there have been no demonstrations against the sanctions or against ECOWAS that I’m aware of. ORTM news has featured various “civil society” representatives (often affiliated with MP22, the SADI-backed pro-junta organization) denouncing the embargo as illegal and immoral, but there’s been no mobilization of people in the streets. Bamako is starting to see small-scale protests against the junta, however. The CNRDRE regime has also announced that it is postponing (perhaps cancelling?) the “national convention” it had scheduled for today. Perhaps not coincidentally, several political parties and civil society groups had said that they would boycott the meeting.
Thank you and good luck.
There are some lovely photos of things I sell too, so hopefully it’ll lead to more people visiting my little shop.
I’ve found a security that goes up in value when the stock prices of junior and senior gold producers rise. We started following it at $30; it trades at $60 today. If gold bullion prices go to only $2,500, this security could triple in price to $180.
Meantime's London Lager is an exceptionally good beer which is needlessly undermined by minuscule, trendy packaging.
We have a returning sponsor this week, Karen's Doodles! Here is a bit of information about Karen's Doodles....
"I noticed recently, I was watching TV and there’s some young director who has done a zombie movie very recently...but I know that he was congratulating himself on inventing the idea of swiftly-moving zombies. And I thought, hmmm, I guess he’s never seen Return Of The Living Dead. Apparently we both invented it." ~Return of the Living Dead director Dan O'Bannon on running zombies
Normally content with lying on his bed while blasting the popular rock music of the day on his headphones, Carl comes to the conclusion that he's spent enough time hiding in shadows, and goes about getting his voice heard by utilizing the uncompromising bluntness that only a rowdy throng can provide. It's an inspirational message that proves what kind of greatness humanity can achieve whenever they decide to stop looking at screens, go outside, and confront the world.
surrendering to the darkest unknown.
I coloured my image with Copics and added some shimmer chalk for some sparkle, DP's ~ Crafts-too,
In the book, Peter, a little African-American boy living in Brooklyn, wakes up to a snowy day, puts on his red snowsuit and goes outside with "a stick just right for knocking snow off of trees, and a snowball in his pocket."
I've failed many times at making the right choice, or choosing the right response
2. Is the person young or old?
a fish swimming into my next poem.
As she’s leaving, she almost runs into Woo Hyun and excitedly raises her hand to greet him but stops when In Young joins him. With a bow, she turns to leave but Ji Woo comes and takes Seung Yeon away. In Young mutters Ji Woo and Seung Yeon look close and if they weren’t both guys, anyone would think they were a couple. Woo Hyun barks out, “They can be girlfriend boyfriend all they want!” He remembers Seung Yeon’s words about being his friend and heads off after freeing his arm from In Young and heading off to meet Team Leader Han and Hyun Suk. Hyun Suk is telling him the advantages of a lavender plant and gives it to Team Leader Han as a gift. She needs it because it invokes calmness.
So I'm going to have to retro-post some projects that I couldn't last week; bare with me as I work hard to catch up. I'm sure we've all suffered from technology failures at some point, lol. My laptop is currently with The Beau and he's backing up everything before we hand it over to the technicians.
Good pillows make life that much more wonderful. Not to mention an original scent, new lingerie, a breeze through screened windows, ridiculous bath products, and colored band aids. It's the simple things.
They are in separate rooms since I have no idea if Magia has any kind of disease or fleas she could contagiate to Mia who is up to date with everything. I'm taking both my girls to the vet as soon as possible, I want them to be fine and happy. BTW, both these pictures were taken by the previous guardians of my kitties I really hope they trust me soon so I can take better pictures for you to enjoy.
Tonight in Tel Aviv there is the first demonstration in Israel against an attack on Iran. I had hoped to go but wasn't able to find a ride there (because of Shabbat, there weren't buses leaving for Tel Aviv in time for me to get to the march, but friends of mine went).
I want to make it really clear that I'm not at all trying to diss parents on a difficult journey who sometimes panic and try to teach their uninterested 9 year old to read: what I'm saying is that there's a fundamental difference between families who believe in the principles of unschooling--in trusting children, and trusting the learning process, and who endeavor to follow these principles, even though they sometimes do panic--and families who stick the term unschooling on themselves without really trusting their children to learn at all.
03 Undress Me
and see the sun
His new book explains the historical accounts of early Marylanders who were alleged to be witches and their interactions with the law.
Score: 8/10.
Still, the majority of developers need to start providing smartphone software that addresses how photographers use this new technology in the creation of fine art. Providing the photographer with software that addresses not only the taking of the the initial exposure, but also serious post production, with a little less emphasis on LoFi special effects, that after a time, one will only tire of.
Wild Turkey 101 Rye, 50.5% abv ($20 if you can find it).
If I'm being honest with myself, the only real option is creating some sort of gallery wall that incorporates the TV...
Bring the milk to a boil.
She's in a fantasy
My 2nd mooncakes :)
In France during the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries there were sometimes no difference between Lenten meals and regular ones, at least for the aristocracy. People would simply find excuses not to fast, complaining, according to the great French gastronome Brillat-Savarin “it irritated them, gave them headache, and prevented them from sleeping. All the troubles associated with the spring were put down to the score of the fast, so that one did not fast because he thought he was poorly, another because he had been, and a third because he feared to be.”
(gifts my own)
Guthrie: you’re not even winning in your home state
We of course were also both subjected to a series of tests including blood work, ultrasounds and a few that I won't mention here but any seasoned IF'er would know just what I am talking about. Bottom line, no tests are fun but they are a means to an end. All came up fairly clear so we were given the go ahead!
I hung the snowflakes in place by first drilling holes into the studs and screwing C hooks into the walls. I strung silver wire between the hooks, and suspended the snowflakes at varying heights from the wire using mono-filament. You could barely tell that the wire and mono-filament were there, creating exactly the magical indoor flurry of snowflakes I had imagined.
learnings about the home we make
2. Take scheduled breaks. Do limit yourself, but working for hours and hours straight can be grating.
Editorial: Laudable growth
Alhamdulillah then, praise be unto God, that you are you and I am I. Two separate personalities but united in the belief and worship of One God. May God make your journey easy (but always interesting). Of course, the funny thing is that often, when the journey becomes really interesting it becomes less easy. Hehehe. Just a thought, sunshine.
I’m not really bothered by runners, but by the act of running. I guess I’m probably a little jealous. My body just wasn’t made for running. I even have trouble making a run for the fridge for an ice-cold beer during commercials while watching my fifty-four, cable sports channels.
Remove the dark and white chocolate creams from the refrigerator and whisk each of them vigorously to loosen and smooth them. With a long metal icing spatula, spread enough dark chocolate cream (about 1 cup) over the cake layer to cover it completely. Top the cream with another cake layer, cut side up, and cover this layer with white chocolate whipped cream, making the white layer about the same thickness as the dark layer. Cover with a third layer, cut side up, and cover with another cup of so of the dark chocolate cream. (You'll have some dark chocolate cream left over--use it as a dip for madeleines or sables). Top with the final layer of cake, cut side down, and frost the sides and top with the remaining white chocolate whipped cream. If you'd like to decorate the top with chocolate shavings or curls, do it now.
In the anime, there’s a group of Sandiles that appeared in several episodes early on. The leader Sandile wears Black Glasses. I thought these Sandiles, or at least the leader, would be a recurring character, like Jigglypuff was. But after the Sandile leader evolved into Krokorok, we never see it again…
Personality traits also played a part in earning families a
-Sophie and Graham have been sharing a room and the sweetest sound is when we put them to bed at night and we can hear them giggling and Soph saying "graham it's time to go to sleep buddy."
It really hit me when I drove by and noticed that they had covered it up with "proper" paint years later. Everytime I'm in the area and drive by I half expect to see it when I glance in that direction.
I've been wanting to make a 'banner' card for awhile, so I decided to try it for this one. First, I'll show you a pic of my supplies. I gathered alot more than I ended up using, but sometimes doing it that way helps with the inspiration.
He will forever haunt me, because he was all I knew
“They are all a just a bunch of hypocrites. I don’t want to follow a God who has them for followers.”
I should have never doubted Kagawa’s storytelling ability. While the story isn’t wholly original, girl turned into monster tries to fight her inner demons and save some of her humanity, Kagawa managed to breathe new life (pardon the pun) into this story.
Take a look into my sketchbook! Those are some random drawings I picked out for you to see. I love to see other artists’ sketchbooks, it’s like a peak into their personal artsy world. Drawings are not always perfect, that’s why it’s called “sketchbook” :)
Annette plays the lovely girl next door and wears one of her prettiest two piece swimsuits, with a net draped across the top. We hear her sing “A Girl Needs a Boy (She Can Count On)” with an echo effect that came to be known as the "Annette sound." Part of the fun of Muscle Beach Party is hearing songs performed enthusiastically by Donna Loren, Little Stevie Wonder (who was 14 at the time), and Dick Dale and the Del-Tones.
Was the thought that is on my head as I was on my way to the CJes building to go to the concept meeting. I bet Jaejoong hyung and Chunnie were already there.
But now I am forced with a dilemma. I have to at least give my boys a chance to love Valentine’s Day and hope that after all the candy years wears off that they will love it enough that they will make someone else’s Valentine’s Day super spectacular.
See what I mean? Men and women are identical, except women are better.
The host of the program responded to this string of banalities with a breathless reply, “Wow.” Wow, indeed.
All those attending have been reminded to bring a small bottle of water, a small thick towel, sale, ear plugs, wear long pants, long sleeves, jogging shoes. It is also very important to be early – at least by 2 hours.
For those who have missed some or all of the FREE Daily Downloads since April 28th, I also have the kit, "Bee a Blessing" in the store. It is 30% off during my Featured Designer spot through May 11th. You can click on the preview to grab it.
And just as they seem to be occupied with revolutionizing themselves and things, creating something that did not exist before, precisely in such epochs of revolutionary crisis they anxiously conjure up the spirits of the past to their service, borrowing from them names, battle slogans, and costumes in order to present this new scene in world history in time-honored disguise and borrowed language.
As described in the illustrations and texts, the wing assembly (including the nose) is as follows. The nose hole is used to pass air down through the front wing pylons into a slot on the underside of the wing. It appears that the slot has a wide span and is very narrow.
a task team to investigate if there had been neg
When Revile, the evil alien who terrorized the Imagine Nation in the past resurfaces Jack must discover his past as well as master his newfound powers if he's going to be able to fight against Revile and save the Imagine Nation and the entire world.
And he seems unwilling to confront an important issue raised in my previous posting. I pointed out that the Community Benefits Agreement was signed by Brooklyn-based groups but seems to benefit many outside Brooklyn. The CBA process raises the question of how to define the “community”: the geographical area? minority groups? African-Americans? And who speaks for that community?
Off to teach Sunday School this morning and then we plan on having a relaxing day as a family. Well..... maybe not all that relaxing as we can get pretty intense when it comes to certain Wii games, but good family fun none-the-less :)
One of the trials and joys of silent film is restoration. Neglect, combustible film stock and bad luck have left us with only a fraction of all the silent films ever produced, and among them, many are incomplete. Metropolis, a nearly three-hour film in its original form, has been carved up, mixed up and rebuilt as much as any of them. By now you’ve heard the story of the rediscovered Argentine footage, which, knitted into the pristine footage we already had, has returned Metropolis to almost its full glory. In brief: this ‘new’ footage—cropped, badly lined, but entirely watchable—recovers most of the exchanges between various heroic characters and the ominous Thin Man (Fritz Rasp); giving Metropolis a noir quality. It also shows us more of the city’s venal surface, and returns to us the heroes’ extended, harrowing escape from the city’s flooded underground. It lets the characters breathe a bit, too, especially Freder Fredersen (Gustav Fröhlich), the young son of Joh Fredersen, Master of Metropolis. Gone, somewhat, is the spastic, naïve, impulsive boy; in his place, a cagier version. The restoration matures him.
I know... I use that Dr. Who quote far too often, but you know what...I like it. So I will continue to do so. HA! Just say'n. BUT...I do have a fun sprocket necklace to share with you today! I created this using the itty bitty Pocket Watch Charm Trinket from Retro Cafe Art Gallery!
Wikipedia says of Frank Hurley:
I am re-posting the below video called "Where is Khaled?" to keep his story alive. Khaled's family was not allowed any contact with him for almost two months. In May family members were allowed to visit him in prison and reported that "he had lost weight and was depressed." As far as I have read about the case, he is being detained as a political prisoner without any legal recourse.
Red Hook Long Hammer IPA – A standard, go-to beer of Golf. Beer. Repeat., Red Hook’s Long Hammer IPA (an India Pale Ale, 6.5% ABV) is the standard of the companies slogan “Liquid Goodness since 1982.” According to Red Hook’s site: “Long Hammer takes the traditional IPA brewing process one step further by dry hopping, or adding hops at the end of the brewing process with Cascade hops to give a wonderful hop aroma but not the overpowering hop taste. Long Hammer IPA is the beer you find yourself reaching for again and again, no matter what the occasion.”
Hmm...
Morning cold crisp air shiny sleeping bag dew tent beanie on 2 sweatshrts and a puffyjacket girlfriends sleeping next to you socks coming off unzip the door tall redwood trees cold cold hard dirt ground grownups awake by a small fire pit smoke rising breakfast cooking bacon oatmeal hot pour you hot chocolate white speckled blue tin mug drinking powder hot chocolate river near by going quickly dog running around the site cold lips changing out of your leggings brushing teeth in the outdoor bathroom sink with your friends hair in a pony tail it's your groups night to cook you are making burritos ghost stories truth or dare with a flashlight letting him kiss you on the lips hiding under the trees.
Or she has found something she likes and wants to offer you that information, too. (Therefore, here is the Wolff & Descourtis fine wool shawl, which "E.A." asked to see after I named it as one of my five best buys of last year.)
Martin Jalleh :
All of them are pretty much impervious to moisture compared to wood, so check, there.
Now, if you are as seasoned in your fishing as these guys were, wouldn’t you be a bit irritated if a stranger suggested that you simply put your nets over the other side to catch some fish? Yet we find that they took this stranger’s advice. Once they were obedient, the Lord revealed Himself.
I’ve cared for you,
But, more importantly
This is the song that Wonder Boy sang for me in the car today, after shyly admitting that several kids at his camp had been singing "inappropriate" (his word) songs. Then, "Do you want to hear one?" I bit the inside of my mouth to keep from laughing and said, very mom-like, "Yes, that song certainly is inappropriate."
Fiiiiiiiine, I'll pick up some flour...and butter...and what?
Handbags are regarded as an indispensable fshion accessory that every fashionable lady demands to have, matching properly with her clothing. Meticulously constructed from introduced in leather along with shut thought to complete and detailing, Louis vuitton Replica hand bags have grown to become the rage among spending budget aware ladies that depend on up-to-date way of life whilst not compromising conventional really feel.
Pain and peace.
This is an official I-doubted-you-apology; to the great people at Flying Dog. It's amazing.
Here's how it used to work: Fly a one-way segment--any segment, whether it's Tampa-Seattle or KC-St. Louis--earn one credit. Get 16 credits, earn a free flight.
Energy companies keep calling me to ask me to change my tariff ( Apparently tariff means what I pay )
On May 4, Yesung tweeted a picture with the short comment, “Nice weather.”
It will never be the death of me.
‘Tis the Season by Trish Perry: Nikki Tronnier is the granddaughter of William Tronnier, and moved back to Cary and works as a chef for a billionaire in the hopes of saving enough money to buy the family home. But as soon as she earns enough money to make a downpayment, someone else buys it from under her. Drew Cornell loves old houses, and he felt something special about the old Tronnier home. He plans on remodeling it to its historic beauty. Will that beauty also include a new bride?
Now, full disclosure here: I'm a dynamite test taker. I'm sure this won't apply to many of you out there, but I think I could have answered all these questions without even listening to the lousy actors. You're welcome to try.
i think it’s because i understood how my behaviour contributed to this ugly ending and by saying sorry, i took responsibility for it. maybe she felt it wasn’t good enough, but it’s more than i can say for her.
funny about yesterday's mention of missing sleep, last night was one of the weirdest attempts at trying to sleep ever. I didn't exercise yet today, so I have to go do that now, otherwise I would tell my story of sleepless woe.
Don’t forget our sketch challenge at SSSIC this week… one of you will win 3 digis of your choice at Sweet N’ Sassy Stamps! For more inspiration, please visit the DT:
Do you pay compliments to strangers, just because? Or have you had any interesting experiences while out doing mundane things?
I hope you liked the card I made today! I'd like to take a moment to say thank you to all of my new followers, you are what makes blogging so enjoyable! Have a great day!
How do you fix such salaries?
Van Der Sar will always be remembered by United fans for his heroic performance in Moscow in 2008 at the Champions League final. His save from Nicolas Anelka’s penalty in the shootout was what gave Manchester United their third European Cup in the club’s history and Ferguson’s second.
Upper West- they may have a softer sound but this duo are putting out some interesting R&B/ Hip Hop productions. The duo dont have the most natural flows but they are experimental and create some good stuff as the track below suggests.
How beautiful the Witch was. How much he was in love with her. At what were they playing?
Turn us
According to the article, "The LCB has been testing the machines in a warehouse in Mechanicsburg for three months, making mostly technical and mechanical alterations to ensure the kiosks work properly, Stapleton said." I'll just bet. Wouldn't you like to have been there to watch the bottles full of water (you don't think...would they actually use real bottles of wine?!) come rolling out? The excitement as the teleoperator (were they in a completely different room of the building?!) determined whether the person utilizing the vending kiosk was the person their ID said they were, and were sober? There's a beaut: did they actually get someone drunk to test that?
I looked forward to reading this as my first adult sci-fi fantasy in many years excepting comedy fantasy. I must say I was not disappointed. Early on in the reading it reminded me of Pratchett and later of Tolkien but these similarities are unfair to draw, as the overall story is an original. The writer is Russian and it has been translated into English, perhaps not perfectly, but well enough to still allow the reader to become fully immersed in the story.
“Now, create a picture in your mind’s eye of the desired result. Imagine it as already existing, with you in that situation. Try to imagine as much sensory detail as you can about the situation (the look, smell and feel of it). Think about it in a positive, optimistic, encouraging way; use mental statements, or affirmations, that confirm that it has or is now happening (not that it will happen in the future). For instance, for someone with a heart problem, ‘My heart is healthy and well.’ For healing, try to imagine healing energy (perhaps as a white light or as your personal deity) filling you and observe it healing the portion of your body that is ill – say, turning a diseased organ into a healthy one. If a good-versus-evil ‘contest’ is most vivid for you, imagine the ‘hero’ cells battling or eating up the ‘bad guys’. Otherwise, visualize diseased cells or tissue changing into healthy cells, healthy cells replacing diseased cells, or imagine your entire body with that specific body part in perfect health. Visualize yourself often as perfectly healthy, carrying out your daily activities. Find an image of the body part on the Internet or in a book as it looks when it is healthy. Imagine your own body part looking like that. Send out the visualization often, both during meditation and throughout the day.”
I’m still reeling from the entire experience. It proved to be so much more than 26 miles. It was a journey of self-discovery, determination, faith, pride, and sharing. Sometimes you talk to someone that has run a marathon and ask them if they will never run another one. “I wanted to do it once,” they say. “It was on my bucket list.” “No thank you- once was enough.”
· Start the fun at home by creating a giant wiggly sign.
losing myself in your thoughts
Give that reporting out from the conference is a way to give back to the organization and to prompt you to remember what commitments you made flowing from it, I try to provide at least a high level summary for colleagues when I return to the office.
Q002) If you had to fill in the blanks of: “Among the members, I’m the most ____”?
Another way to think of the working memory is that it generally can hold seven pieces of information at a time. That is another way it is limited. That is also why phone numbers are seven digits. People truly know the area code (normally when they hear a new number) but can hold those new seven digits until they are put in a contact list.
It is really the mind – manas that needs to be purified. Chitta is already pure.
You'd wonder where you are.
But tomorrow it is back to the insane pace again as we head north to Wiang Pa Pao, where Grace Place, Thailand, is located. We will be riding on the back of trucks and sleeping in the "Bamboo Hilton." More later, but you will have to stay tuned because we will be without Internet for a couple of days.
The President of the United States is a Weirdo
to flow again as it did then when prayers were ended with “amen”.
Brown sugar- 1/2 cup, packed
There have been 214 exonerations based on DNA evidence, almost all of them in rape cases, according to the Innocence Project at the Cardozo School of Law. But there is no obvious control group to measure these exonerations against.
One thing I’m glad about is that no one can accuse Silvio Berlusconi of being the ghost, for the obvious reason that he’s still alive. The latest allegation against him is that he invited strippers dressed as nuns to a “bunga-bunga” party. So what if he did? Everyone knows that nuns are passionate women who are only able to abstain from sex because their minds are so imaginative. Making them sex symbols is obviously an act of homage in a Catholic county.
In other words, physical signs aren’t enough to explain what stress is doing to us every day. You can’t simply “lower your stress” by avoiding pressured situations. A completely easy life, without pressure of any kind (if such a hypothetical life existed), needs only one deeply disturbing event, such as the death of a baby, to be scarred for years and change the course of a person’s existence. At the opposite extreme, stress can act like high blood pressure, which damages the body through a slight increase in stress on the cell walls, seemingly innocuous at first glance. The cell performs all of its functions without seeming distressed, and yet years later, a huge array of problems can arise.
Masa
Overall, from the beginning to end the day was perfect. Planning from afar was hard but having a destination wedding in a place so special to us was so worth it. The part I loved about a destination wedding was that all the guests get to spend a few quality days together and really get to know each other. Seeing my Irish great uncle chatting away with my best friend from college warmed my heart. It’s basically one day where you have your entire life in one room. It was an exciting, romantic and amazing day and Juan and I genuinely had a blast. On that day my name changed from O’Brien to Vives and Vives means ‘to live’ in Spanish, and that’s exactly what Juan and I are excited to take on together.
He further states,
HOW TO PLAY! So, do you want a chance to win Flourishes entire March Release? All you need to do is be inspired by the color palette above and use it in a creation! Once you are done, just link up over on the Flourishes Blog using the inlinkz widget and you will be in the running. You have until Friday, March 16th at 5PM EST to enter! Just click HERE for all the official details!
Hello strangers...remember me? A couple of months ago my husband and myself sold our home in Saskatoon, Saskatchewan...we than drove cross country to our new home in Gibsons British Columbia. Well...we had full intentions to NOT pick up a hammer or a paint brush for at least a year. We had firm intentions to take some time to enjoy our new home, relax...spend leisurely mornings sipping lattes and reading the local paper...NOT...THIS WINTER ITS GONNA BE A 2 ELEMENT HOTPLATE TO COOK ON AND A LAUNDRY SINK TO DO DISHES...YIPPEEE!!!
In those wee hours, when everyone is asleep, but I have to be up to pump, I sit in the quiet and I pray.
Help us to set our sails and show us that flourishing might.
Woweeeee, I'll be busy and definately need a schedule carved in stone that's for sure.
06-15 Orlando, FL – Beacham
Arm. Wrestling.
It is warming up, there’s a layer of high clouds overhead, and the meteorologists are backing off from their predictions of heavy rain for tomorrow. I guess I’ll have to wait until tomorrow to decide what I am going to do. If the weather is nice, I will go to Aman Park to photograph the awesome display of wildflowers that bloom there. I have to get through today first, so off I go!
Have they never heard of a video link for goodness sake! Or alternatively they could have held the court in his bathroom!
The middle aged man would rally..... ( as all parents must do, in the end..)
f. Check out this guy. My husband is doing his new record cover. He’s the fucking best and is now living large in LA. If you’re in the greater Los Angeles area, look him up. Go get a coffee with him. Maybe go for a jog around the Silverlake reservoir.
At the end of the day all I could come up with is this though:
I think for the most part, happiness is a state of mind. The power of positive thinking is critical. I find that reading quotes helps me keep my focus. I keep ones that I like in a folder and reach for it when I need motivation or to get back on track. One of the best that I can think of (from memory) is the saying that people are only as happy as they make up their mind to be. How true! Each day is what you make it.
I couldn't wait to get home and give him a call. I wanted to ask if he'd be willing to draw this cross, but I couldn't quite work out the details. I couldn't decide if I should pick a cross from my collection for him to draw or if I should encourage him to design his own. For some reason, the pieces were not falling into place. Things got even more fuzzy when I actually made the phone call and didn't get to speak with him because he was feeling bad.
All seniors, their families, caregivers and friends are invited to attend.
Spaghetti jaffle $7.50
At the end of their wearable lives, most of our clothes ended up cut into rags. But I have seem some beautiful crafts made with clothing scraps as well, such as memory quilts and rag rugs. What ideas do you have for clothes at the end of their wearability? We’d love to hear your ideas!
She was kidding. He was perfect. The only thing he did wrong was nibble the farrier and chew the crossties. When she got there, he was nearly done and only wanted to know if I wanted the shoes back on or not.
Also did I mention that I really hate cancer lately? My prayers are going out to all my people who are feeling the effects of cancer in their life right now. Kick that junk in the craphole.
We only get what we will settle for
Opal Adaline Sharp (1909-1995), daughter of Austin and Martha Sharp.
Happy outfit-planning!
Other traditional cultures, such as those in the Middle East and the Mediterranean regions, have evolved diets that consist mainly of lacto-ovo vegetarian foods. The Mediterranean diet, which a Harvard study declared to be one of the world’s healthiest, is primarily although not strictly lacto-ovo vegetarian.
Hard hitting mentions, of you in passing.
Here's my take on this. Human nature being what it is, the third sector contains some unscrupulous people wishing to exaggerate the scale of homelessness in Swansea (and Wales, generally) in order to, a) guarantee their own positions and salaries and, b) make political points about 'wicked, uncaring capitalism'. Before anyone accuses me of right wing bias, just remember this: most of the third sector in Wales - outfits like AWEMA - must justify their existence and their funding by identifying and stressing a 'problem'. The bigger that 'problem' can be made to appear then the more funding can be claimed. This is an incontrovertible fact.
Friso was into investment banking in the sectors media and technology and was also assigned to Goldman Sachs Capital Partners, the private equity arm of Goldman Sachs.
pursued by a giant Imperial Beerdestroyer. Hundreds of deadly
The courts are already backlogged, imagine what sheaths of complaint are hitting the desks today from all those who were foreclosed and evicted or threatened with the process, and all those who bought those foreclosed dwellings, ahem, illegally? What a scene: the angry millions forcing their ways through the McMansion doors demanding their homes back from alarmed young couples feeding baby number one in the breakfast nook? What are they gonna do in this economy, double up? Oh why not, they'll learn to get along just like we do, but they won't be happy about it until they win their lawsuits. As we watch an entire new industry is being born, the graduation of Robo Signers to Paper Seekers tasked with unwrapping all the CDOs and sifting through xeroxes of xeroxes to find something that is probably lying under the mattress in Polanski's chalet if it actually exists, legitimate titles of home ownership and legitimate titles to commercial properties that is, not the mattress. We only know one thing for sure at this point and that is: Everyone has again stepped on yet another rung of the Apocalypse ladder where nothing is what it seemed and all hell is breaking loose from the shylocks to the cowboys on bar stools looking for love in all the wrong places. There's a big range in between consisting of the colorful variety of Planetary Citizens.
1. Bug Out
But there is a difference between Hunt’s bias and that of Cable. Yes, Hunt comes to this decision with a completely biased and politically-loaded perspective, one which makes it almost inevitable he will allow Murdoch to take over BSkyB. Just as it was inevitable that he would squeeze (and will continue to squeeze) the BBC – ideally, one suspects, into non-existence.
Maybe we think it is, still, after all this argument okay. Why? Surely the only reason must be some thinking along these lines: “criminals are all a bunch of paedo’s and murderers and should be given the death penalty anyway.” Once in prison you have been proven to be scum. Ignoring the many cases which are won on appeal, where the wrongly convicted come out of prison sometimes years, even decades after being sentenced, let’s just agree with this sentiment. Prisoners are scum. In which case, surely the last thing we want is to dehumanise them even more; to make them more bitter, more angry, more hopeless, even less able to cope with life, with even more hate for our police and our laws – in other words even more dangerous?
Pretty much ever since I've been of age, and of money, to be able to get my Dad real gifts I've generally bought him clothes. I'd say he loves it... unlike the plumb bob I made him back in grade 9 tech class which I didn't even make plumb. lol
The murder of JonBenét Ramsey in late 1996 turned the public spotlight onto child beauty pageants. Critics began to question the ethics of parents who would present their child in such a way. Dan Rather was noted for criticizing CBS for airing Ramsey’s tapes, calling them ‘kiddie porn.’mIn 2001, HBO aired its Emmy-winning ‘Living Dolls: The Making of a Child Beauty Queen,’ which garnered much attention.
The Sentiment on that was a stamp which was a RAK from a good soul, who I cannot remember now, unfortunately.... SORRY..... If it is u, I am sorry from the bottom of my heart & thank u for it.....
I arrived in Copenhagen a little lost, but somewhat excited. I found my next flight easy, so much easier than I thought it would be. In fact I got there an hour earlier than I was suppose too. Time went by and I handed my passport and ticket to be checked, I walked onto my second flight bound for Seattle. A 10hr flight later and I walked off into Customs, the line was long, and I slowly walked over to a booth where my passport was stamped. Yaay I had a stamp on my passport! I slowly boarded a Transit Train, which took me to collect my luggage; I didn’t know where to go from there so I stood still. I noticed everyone going up the escalator in front of me. I walked a little to the escalator and I saw a familiar face, Clayton was standing right at the top. I walked on and watched Clayton move towards me, as the stairs moved to the top. I smiled and tried to speak but I couldn’t my mouth was so dry and I was so tired. He handed me a single red rose and I smiled, as I smelled the flower.
59. Lloyd Price Orchestra - I Heard It Through The Grapevine (2:49)
We try to be unselfish and kind
What is worth noting (though Eyewear in principle supports the mass distribution of poetry to newspaper readers at all times) is that this is completely a list taken from Faber and Faber's stable of poets. Now, they also publish Frost, Dylan Thomas and Wallace Stevens, in the UK, so Faber's top ten would still have been very admirable. And one might have added Lowell, Moore, Berryman and even Thomas Hardy, and they'd have been Faber, too. Ditto for W.S. Graham. Yeats seems curiously missing here - isn't he the greatest 20th century poet? Where is Hart Crane, or Langston Hughes? Other women, besides the iconic Plath? Post-colonial "voices"? An Australian, an Indian, a Canadian...
Here’s a small test you can do: Roll a basketball off your shoulder and see what it does. Does it return to the height that it fell every time? That would be “no.”
Leading up to Acts 13, the focus was on the Kingdom and the gospel of the Kingdom. After Acts 13 such a ministry is distinctly lacking. In fact, rather than inheriting the Kingdom, Israel was blinded, for so we see in Romans 11:25, which was written by Paul about the time of the 20th chapter of Acts.
Check out the full deets HERE at the SSS blog! And Nicole always has a SWEET deal going on for release week. All I can say is this set is a MUST HAVE for any scrapper...just sayin' ;) I have two projects for you today showing how much I loooooove this stamp set. You can use it SO many ways!
They demanded that he show them the safe and took R2 000 in cash. They also took his Chrysler Voyager.
I'm an advertising copywriter and brand consultant. I also work as the senior editor and writer for a newly launched eldercare website, icarevillage.com. But writing fiction is my passion. I was accepted to the Squaw Valley Writers Conference in 2006, and attended, by invitation, Elle Newmark's Lake Como Writers Conference in 2009 with author Janet Fitch. I was granted a residency at Dorland Mountain Arts Colony in 2004 and recently served as a judge for the San Diego Book Awards short story competition.
Here are some reasons:
I am so stunned. Why did I never try this before?
20. Figure out how to make powder room presentable. ($$$)
Try as he might, the little hedgehog would not budge. The mage spent the remainder of the trip planning the “recovery mission”, unaided by the agitated Prism, who’s quills flashed from color to color in her disturbed state. You-eh stood nearby, silently listening as the two louder members bickered between themselves.
I haven’t talked about roasted vegetables recently, but that doesn’t mean they’re far from my mind. Uh-uh.
Serve warm with dal and rice.
As Sor’s works were published in various countries, his name was translated, leading to variations in the spelling.
4. Add the mushrooms and cook for another 2 minutes.
Your favorite angel food batter or a box mix
When they persist with borrow-and-spend stimulus, foreign creditors dump their government bonds and threaten to shut down their entire economy.
In the 1980s a cement render was applied to the facade of the building, changing the texture of the stone facade.
So, which of the two groups are the truly creative?
Dream Big
Out of such materials has Moriarty left us to roam the ruins and to attempt to rebuild. His publisher, The Lilliput Press, will be issuing a pricy (250 euro!) spoken-word CD set to fund a hedge-school project he had dreamed of in his native Kerry. In print, and as I have observed about "Nostos," Moriarty's reflections can, taken at random, appear almost random or half-crazed. I suppose this is the prophetic tone. He seeks the oracular, and although I perhaps wished in this slim volume more direct suggestions for how to heal an Irish psyche and transform yearnings for territorial dominance into spiritual ecumenism, Moriarty-- as with earlier sages and gurus-- leaves the hard work of change with those of us who must follow the message with the mission.
the month of august on my return
Those involved in trying to revive PBDS were the former members of the party who have remained partyless.
we should do the same."
As soon as Kaylee walked out the door from story time at the library where she behaved perfectly, it was mere moments before I was ready to shout, "Serenity nooooow!" (Seinfeld fans, there's a treat for you at the end...) because she turned into an absolute crazy person.
The Golden Globe winning show's intriguing storyline and great ensemble cast has generated a huge following and the designs caused such a stir that Beth decided to create a blog to answer fan questions. It was inevitable that a furniture and accessory line would follow.
Through untried roads with ambushes opponents lined,
We want to learn why God promotes us, and Esther still has more to show us through her life’s example. This time, we get to look closer at the other characters in the account–Mordecai, Haman, and King Ahasuerus.
It’s about a mean, selfish Captain and his spoilt, nasty daughter who treat the other pirates on this ship badly.
So I wrote a second post linking to the first, and it appeared in search results, thus (note that the original post is still invisible, though)
Ingredients:
Being a Mum today is hard enough. Let's cut ourselves some slack and be there for the highs and the lows.
“I’ll give you food,” Nikolas said hopefully.
Funny though, last Friday two people thought he was a girl and the way he was dressed and really, just looking at him, I didn't see it. Girl or boy, I love him or her to death!
I mean, it is a theory people! You all probably know all about it and I am the last to discover it, but there it is.
Bake for 1 hour
The Committee of European Banking Supervisors (CEBS) together with the EC and ECB has published its eagerly awaited results of stress-testing 91 European banks. The two Irish banks included in the exercise, Bank of Ireland and Allied Irish Banks passed the stress-test which set out to examine the capital base of banks in two scenarios – a benchmark scenario and an adverse scenario. Good news for BoI and AIB – seven other European banks didn’t pass the test.
let him not prevail against us. In a thousand ways he will lay snares for our
Neither of us have done this before, and I think we're both a little confused about how it works and what it might require of us...but I think it's going to be a great experience! I'm very excited to meet more fellow writer-bloggers. :)
Unfortunately the people of Great Britain misinterpreted this gesture of good will has a chance in a million miracle and captured the whale, building their ship right on its back and carved open its brain to torture it in to moving. This led to the paradoxical situation in the ensuing years as the people began to realise they could not justify their survival off of the suffering of an innocent creature. But they believed if they released it, the creature would destroy the ship in its escape; so they devised the forget system to erase the memories and the Smilers and Winders to insure no one discovered the truth and to "Dispose" of those who didn't agree to have their memory erased.
Whilst the chocolate is cooling, beat the butter and icing sugar together until light and fluffy. Then mix in the melted chocolate.
from slate sidewalks,
Too bad for the fool hearted clown
You should know, Steve was quite an athlete when he was younger. He was a gymnast for years and played soccer into college. He is an EXTREMELY fast runner, but I'll be honest, I've never seen him in a sack race, so I really didn't know what to expect.
He said the issue of recovery of decomposed bodies was extremely deplorable and intelligence agencies were being held responsible for it. He said the government’s failure to investigate these incidents created an impression of the state’s involvement in the killings.
By contrast, China’s one-child policy will, by 2050, leave it with a rapidly aging population. Russia is already on the precipice of both a diminishing and aging population. Japan, too, has an aging population and no real diversity.
I made haddock today but any white fish that isn’t too delicate would be just fine.
The theme over at Try It On Tuesday this week is 'Pampered Pets' I was a bit stuck for for my DT card this time as I don't have any pets, and don't have any stamps with pets - only House Mouse and I don't think they count!
Only time will tell who will make the grade in the world of Cloud infrastructure, but one suspects that Microsoft will be well placed in the final shake-up.
The Kobo Touch also brings some cool extra perks, compared to the cheaper Kobo Wifi (which I used to own until it was stolen last year). One is that it includes beta versions of a browser, Sudoku game and sketch page. It also tracks your reading stats (how much on average you read in each session, how much of your library you’ve completed, etc). Newspaper/magazine subscriptions will download automatically if you have active Wifi available (unlike my old Kobo, which only had that update late last year), but I have to warn that newspaper and magazine articles and especially graphics look horrible on the eInk screen.
According to various sources a repeat of the previous show (Thursday 5 April) was screened at 15:00. Thereafter the usual Friday broadcast was televised, starting at the normal time of 18:30. The Afrikaans version of the magazine, “TV-PLUS”, covering the period 4 – 17 April 2012, is one of the many TV-guides that confirms this fact.
Perhaps Hosoe's most meta deed is "The Cosmos of Gaudi." He waited 13 years before he began photographing Antonio Gaudi's architecture, then devoted seven years to depicting these wondrous creations. The wisdom of patience, of mentally absorbing and arranging, obviously paid off.
Thank you for looking:)
5)Jihad became a binding duty upon ummah from the day allah imposed it upon muslims and it will remain a duty till islam rules the whole of infidel world. Islam does not require muslims to convert all infidels to islam but that all infidels must live under islamic shariah or jurisdiction. The problem with living under islamic rule is that muslims and nonmuslims are not accepted as equal. For example, a nonmuslim is not allowed to be the ruler of an islamic state etc etc.
Technology has permitted us to harness this tremendous power. Gutenberg’s printing press made Martin Luther’s reformation possible and in the process changed the course of world history. Over 550 years later, the Internet created the greatest paradigm shift since Gutenberg and reconfirmed the power of the written word in the very midst of the television era (an era that spawned alarmist dystopian literature like Ray Bradbury’s Fahrenheit 451). With the Internet came e-mail. Soon, the BlackBerry mobile device made e-mail easier to access than ever. Finally, texting and Twitter arrived, and the written word assumed superiority over the spoken. In this, a battle waged from time immemorial came to an anti-climactic end in less than two decades.
Arthur Conan Doyle:
What did the trial of ADL expose?
Remembered by a heart too hard to beat warmth
Is all restored to man.
To be fair, at least a few hundred of those haven't learned English yet. Again, how we Americans can sleep at night knowing that so many in this world have yet to learn how to say brilliant things like "I'm drinking my drink until I've drunk all of it and then I'll be drunk" or, "I know, right?" is beyond me.
I'm really sorry to say that I haven't been inspired by too much these last few weeks. I've been dragging my feet on Easter preparations. I have a bunch of great ideas for cookies, but can't seem to find the motivation to get them completed. Or started, for that matter. I have a list of causes for this creative slump: weather, economy, lack of sleep, too much sleep, missing 2 weeks of Project Runway, swimsuit shopping, diet food, dentist/dr trips, allergies...If I learned anything in grad school, it was how to find something or someone to blame.
Mr. Margaret Bassackwards:You see. She totally grasps the concept, really.
that surfaced on 1980's 'Never for Ever' and the harrowing
The online coding tutorial rewards you with a blue check mark on every exercise you successfully complete, and it's a good feeling to see one surface on the page, a sense of progress and mastery, even if you later realize that you have to go back to those old exercises because you've forgotten something important about the correct placement of semi-colons and the script you're trying to write isn't working anymore.
At times like this, I think the tendency is to make wild promises about how one will lead ones life going forward. “I’ll go to church every Sunday.” “I’ll give more to charity.” “I’ll stop swearing.” “I’ll never drink again.” “I’ll only cheat at cards if I plan to give the profits to charity, while not drinking or swearing.” You get the picture.
*The photograph is of a clay mask that was created as a demonstration while working with children in 1994.
I am a far different person than I was when C&C were born. I like to think I am far better. Clearly not FAR better but better nonetheless. As much as I would like to think I am a super mom I know better.
So she took what she saw as her only route out of a job she was finding unbearably stressful: Sarah got pregnant. Now she spends her days at home with her one-year-old daughter, Alex. It’s a long way from the chaos of the classroom, and Sarah is unapologetic about the choice she has made.
So, I'll see you in seven days or thereabouts and leave you with last Tuesday's Podrophenia, featuring a live acoustic session from special guest and former The Shopkeeper Appeared artist - Andy J Gallagher..
I hope you enjoy this fun tutorial. and have a great day
Scarlett Johansson as Black Widow and Jeremy Renner as Hawkeye are both great in their roles and together, though they fight along side powers their humanity doesn’t slow them down, the fight alongside the others well and their backstory is touched upon, I feel we could do with more of these two in the future, they are brilliant together.
An unreturnable gift.........
Each year, the City University of New York (CUNY) enrolls more than 450,000 students City-wide within eleven senior colleges, six community colleges, the William E. Macaulay Honors College, the Graduate School and University Center, the CUNY Graduate School of Journalism, the CUNY School of Law, the CUNY School of Professional Studies and the Sophie Davis School of Biomedical Education- equaling almost half of all college or university students in the City of New York.
Flash Gordon (ESMB)
Paper: wild wasabi, so saffron (SU), heavenly white (PaperTemptres), designer paper (EP)
Commenting on this, Rix LJ observed, at para 71:
The nice thing about smoothies is that you can just add whatever you have on hand. Here is my "go-to" recipe:
I wanted to write on Valentine's Day, but it was on a Saturday and my husband is home only on weekends right now, so anything other than spending time with him and our daughter, Katie, is really out of the question. So since that day I have been thinking about how to fit everything in that I want to write about without boring you all to distraction. It won't be easy, the list is long.
As you can see there is a clear overlap between the EU and CoE/ECtHR - in fact to join the EU you must be a member of the CoE/ECtHR - but it is clear that there is a significant difference between the two, even when simply looking at the members of each.
locked and loaded
Jenny @ Freebie Spot said...
The leaves and grasses are starting to take hold and with it comes the bears
Cover the pan with saran wrap and refridgerate for 24 hours (alternately, freeze for 3-4) and then pull out 20 minutes before serving.
don’t know I don’t—
Another myth revolves around ‘dumbing down’ the recipe to ‘cheat the drinker’ which pops up regularly. Many Ale Stars were, I’m sure, pleased to hear that LC are happy to switch hop varieties, alter mash temperatures and tweak other nerdy brewing procedures to keep their flagship Pale Ale up to scratch. Seasonal variations in raw materials and a constant desire to keep searching for beer perfection means that batch-to-batch variations are not just planned for but embraced.
O excess of goodness! my dear Redeemer, not content to have paid the debt due for my sins in history, with the price of his precious blood shed on Mount Calvary, but daily continues it, offering himself or the same end in the Sacrifice of Holy Mass. What can be compared to this charity? Who is like my Saviour in goodness, who gives himself and the treasures of his merits to pay what I owe for my sins?
I wanted my Old Boy to have a nice, inviting frothy top, and I was unwilling to let much of it go down the drain. My pouring was done with reasonable care, and I'd waited several hours before even daring to pour, but the result was still a glass full of gloopy yeast which was merely accompanied by some very lovely beer.
2 Merci Baku Okashi 5:11
In biting cold February it’s a shelter or a temporary picnic table, but its apex is in late summer or early autumn. It sits above a pocket-sized vineyard, and when the air is heavy with ripening grapes, the only sounds you hear are the whispers of the wind through the vine leaves.
And Seamus says, Now, what chance has that
He also has a special vehicle called a Whirry Bang, designed by Hamish himself which can be a little unreliable at times.
Furthermore, there should be more info on what works and what doesn’t.
The dollar’s rise has created bargains for individuals and businesses by reducing the cost of imports. It costs less for consumers to shop south of the border. Businesses that bring in equipment and materials get more for their money, providing the potential to boost productivity and increase profits.
You may be wondering right now if GOD will accept you. The answer is yes. "For whosoever shall call upon the name of the Lord shall be saved" Romans 10:13. Whosoever which means it doesn't matter weather your boy or girl or short or tall or what you look like or how much or how little money you have or if your disabled or not. http://www.google.com/imgres?hl=en&gbv=2&biw=1022&bih=571&tbm=isch&tbnid=VtRGuwc6S5hdzM:&imgrefurl=http://jackwoodard.wordpress.com/2011/04/22/to-go-to-heaven-you-must-be-born-again/&docid=IHaiPggTuvMxqM&imgurl=http://jackwoodard.files.wordpress.com/2011/04/jesus-christ-pics-1112.jpg&w=640&h=452&ei=hgp-T4-BJ8riiALyvdWeDg&zoom=1&iact=hc&vpx=85&vpy=214&dur=375&hovh=189&hovw=267&tx=115&ty=118&sig=116399563033025264842&page=4&tbnh=114&tbnw=161&start=63&ndsp=22&ved=1t:429,r:12,s:63,i:301
In my last blog post called We happy breed. We who enjoy smoking are on our own! I waxed not so lyrical about the tobacco companies running scared of the display ban and refusing to fight it last Saturday and one of my commentators, sillyusername, pointed out that Norway has had a display ban for the past two years and gave some observations:
Boy: I'm just saying....
Judge # 2 -- This final entry is a good, balanced chili. Neither mild nor hot.. Sorry to see that most of it was lost when Judge #3 farted, passed out, fell over and pulled the chili pot down on top of himself. Not sure if he's going to make it. Poor feller, wonder how he'd have reacted when we started tasting some really hot chili?
Min YI, Correa-Villasenor A, Stewart PA. Parental occupational lead exposure and low birth weight. Am J Ind Med 1996; 30: 569-578.
This post isn’t about how to earn more money. It’s about how to stretch, budget, and track what you got. It also isn’t a whiny post about someone who makes 100k+ a year and they can’t figure out how to live on a budget of $1,000+ of expendable income a week.
We decided to drive and see the wild flowers last Saturday. We only left after 10 am but we so enjoyed the day!
A month later I saw it again, and the same conversation was still going on. By the time the ball happened, I’m sure the child was asking his dad if he could go on his walking frame. Maybe my sense of humour is a bit Royal Tenenbaums, but I found the “stately” pace and non-plot incredibly funny.
So here's the problem - I used to write this because it made me snigger in a frankly immature way. I am now my own worst critic; every time I start a blog entry I find my lip curling in what practised writers refer to as the "Sarcastic Bystander" way. The hint, apparently, to avoid taking yourself too seriously, is to imagine everything you write being read aloud by a sarcastic bystander: "Lolita, my light, my life, my sin, my soul... seriously Vlad, you fancy yourself a bit with the poncey alliteration, don't you?"
Lee Tripeo lowers himself into a large tub filled
There are too many examples in this category to be mentioned but to begin with let me just mention PS I Love You. Ok this novel wasn’t the most ground breaking or inspiring piece of literature that you’ll ever read but it provided that wonderful bit of escapism that Ahern’s readers were obviously looking for. Cue on screen adaption, or should I say butchering, of a fine novel. Dear god if you can change the leading lady’s nationality from the novel for no reason then why couldn’t you change the leading man’s???? I really wish you had. Anyone who wasn’t deaf was having a very painful experience listening to Gerard Butler try and fail to be Irish. I cringed the whole way through it and the only conclusion I could make at the end was that he really only managed to sound like a constipated Scottish man. If you insist on watching this movie then I would advise that you to use the mute button and the subtitles feature as much as possible.
I have a feeling we could get quite stuck on this little blog. I hope you enjoy it!
What’s the best thing and worst thing about being a writer?
Because the beam hadn't switched off, she was totally untouched by the calamity. Not even a mote of dust had settled on her pristine human body. She stood up and smoothed out her rumpled flannel jammies.
Rob Zombie- Foxy Foxy
What's tickling mental clits and dicks is Cox's ability to smile while talking. This is quite an achievement. Most people who smile while talking are probably planning to kill you; they're loons: but Coxy Babe couldn't drown a kitten. He's a cuddlesome, hard-geeing northerner geek in awe of the universe. His very orgasmic, transferable relish in repeating what his profs taught him at uni alchemises his commonplaces, with that toothy smile. That he sounds like a simpleton while parroting the number of air molecules in a pebble disarms because one knows he's a swot and make no mistake. We need to look down a bit first before we look up.
Happy New Year to you! May 2012 bring you peace and happiness.
if you’re yearning for me as you remember the past memories
On the day she left, I planted the tree. I brought the poor, feeble twig home from work at the Conservation Department to a barren house.
This is only the second time I've worn this skirt on the blog in almost a year. For some reason I just don't wear it that often (it was originally purchased for Easter 2008 I think it was--if not 07). However, I can't seem to part with it just in case I want to wear it one day. I'm sure you've all been there.
Miesje has challenged us to create a card or project that uses both dark and light. Opposite colors; black/white, brown/ivory, deep blue/baby blue, red/pink etc.
Pieces in Set 1
But... do they make those decisions the other 364 days? I'm not so sure looking at the number of non-joggers, drinkers, and pantless-elevator-polluters in my entourage.
I haven't been writing on this blog... my blog appears to be no longer my sacred safe spot... I shared the link to my blog with a friend when she was going through a low time, not knowing until later that others, who appear to not be my friends, had access to the e-mail I sent.
1-2 by Tickle, but Geraghty goes underneath and gets the take down.
Mr. Obama reached the darkest low of his presidency this week in South Korea when he was caught on an unseen mic plotting with the leader of one of our oldest adversaries to thwart the will of American voters and advance the interests of enemies who want to see the world’s last remaining beacon of freedom finally destroyed.
He was mildly amusing at times, so I wasn't always offended by his presence in small doses. But he would usually remind me quickly why I didn't like him very much. One night, after the three of us had dinner together, we all got frozen yogurt cones. On our way out of the dining hall, Z decided he was not going to finish his. There was still quite a bit of it remaining. I watched in shock as he opened the US Mailbox, which was positioned next to the garbage can, and dropped his drippy yogurt cone into it.
"I find that the immediate response from some people is to ask what's going on, what does it mean, where are the guidelines to tell me what's happened? You don't say that about your life. Or at least as you get older you stop saying that. I can only show the dance; if I explain it that may take something away."
Sentiment from the Humphreys Corner Christmas Joy set.
Well obviously we’ll need to do all we can to promote the new CD and that really eats into your time. We hope to have the full CD completed in time for a UK tour we are doing in late February. Then later on we will be going to the States in the summer, where we will be doing some gigs including a festival and teaching a week long summer school in Maryland. We have some funding lined up to start recording the music we have been developing with Helga and Arnór in Mandal, so we need to get on with that. Later on, I have a solo English tour in November.
Now I wonder, how does it work for you? Did you also start to pay attention to brands in general, because it's such a big deal in lolita fashion? I think it has hugely influenced me.
Oh, and email me for your dollar .
Since Hodmandod senior is a research chemist and spent his youth in his garden shed endeavouring, with some success, to make explosives, he anticipates bonfire night with relish. Every year a box of fireworks is brought home with some celebration and we eagerly inspect the selection: Siberian Snowfall, Subarctic Blizzard, Vesuvius Spring.
I don’t have a good track record with Alien games and it’s not for the reason you’re thinking. It’s not because the games are crap (well some are) but they just freak me the hell out. If it’s not those face huggers jumping at the screen at me it’s that bloody motion tracker which has me sounding like an extra from a Batman film screening ‘WHERE ARE YOU???” at the TV screen.
First, you buy whole raw cashews. (Says Chef Tal, “not pieces, which are often dry.”) Next, rinse them well and drain them. Then, put them in a bowl and add enough cold water to cover them. Now you let them soak, overnight, in the fridge. When they soak, they become whiter and puffier, something I did not expect from a cashew. Look:
I don't think anyone else in the dining room spoke English because no one else stopped eating their scrambled eggs long enough to even raise an eyebrow. It's a shame they didn't realize how sexy their breakfast was.
I'm no cowgirl, but I do love a functional bag combined with some aesthetically pleasing touches. You already know how much I love cross-body bags, and saddle bags are essentially the same types of purses. They are usually made of a durable material, have a long strap that can be worn cross-body, and have an button closure for easy access to your items.
Angel and I left Friday evening by bus. It was a quick trip: only about five and a half hours. Of course this time was spent with us laughing and messing around like usual, but the ride didn’t get good until we ripped the caps off our Don Simon’s Tinto de Verano bottles.
But a picture speaks a thousand words, so have one of those:
I’m certain I’m not the only one who is on a journey of self-discovery. And, I’m certain that I’m not the only one who uses the written word as a means for learning about oneself. Keeping a journal has been an integral part of my journey and healing process. (Plus, as I previously mentioned, I love stationary! When I see a pretty notebook, I buy it! Honestly, though, I have never once filled up an entire notebook before starting another!) This blog is an extension of that process, a place where I can share my thoughts, dreams, hopes, discoveries, frustrations and so forth.
My lower back is aching, I have insomnia, I have been having braxton hicks for weeks, and they are uncomfortable. I am already starting to get swollen ankles! Gah. It's hard to rest properly and it's hard to look after myself, what with school runs, entertaining a 4 yr old and the recent spate of illnesses here. Added to that I am trying to cram as much writing in as possible before the baby is born, and I've taken on a fairly big role at school... well, I'm starting to feel a bit overwhelmed.
Unibroue Maudite
(* Kadyos are those beans similar to red beans.)
can really be in "each moment" when I'm in my head, versus my heart. When I am aware of
I have added another category this week as well. Date night. It is explained below with the rest of the categories in case you missed them last week. There are now 8 categories, so I can pick & choose each week.
This was the first time I’ve ever created a fictional kingdom in one of my books, and it was huge fun. The only information I was given about Santosa was that it was ‘a small island principality off the coast of Brazil’, so the rest was up to me. A lovely couple of hours of cyber-tourism led me to the island of Fernando de Noronha and this became the inspiration for Santosa.
century, the story that Freemasonry was somehow intertwined with Jewish
If you’re serious about addressing this disorder in your life, sit down and make a list of all the things perfectionism has cost you, and all the crazy things you’ve done as a result of being a perfectaholic. Be honest with yourself. I once spent seven hours writing “the perfect” sentence to impress a teacher. (And that’s one of my milder examples… )
History tends to repeat itself, but only if the young are barred from the truth. I disliked history in school, but am glad to have absorbed what I could and lived through some tough times. Many of our young, who have grown up in an age where communication and learning opportunities are abundant, have developed social skills by communicating, but have sorely neglected the learning that is so necessary to identify those who would dazzle them with words. What Ayers and many others in our universities and schools are teaching, sounds great. Those of us who know the past, recognize that they are just words; words that when put in practice have, not only failed to produce the desired result, but have destroyed freedom, enslaved and ended millions of lives.
There is no solution. The great minds struggling
For the life of me I am just too lazy to search for the video that I want to put into this posting. Maybe for starters, Shahrizat Jalil could have asked her husband to take a look at this video first before getting involved in the NFC. For GE13, I don’t think it is fair for BN supporters to be answering on Shahrizat’s personal issue on behalf of her and her family as the BN members at large do not benefit from the business.
seeking guidance.
Black families were given R15 000 each under the old “Derek Hanekom scheme” as it is called by local farmers, and nearby farms were purchased. Now they are squatter camps feeding off productive farms nearby. (Where is Mr. Hanekom now? Has he visited these areas?)
They are not the first but I apologise if the lack of content when you click on any AFP clips below affects your enjoyment of this blog.
Her stomach growls like a tigress and she shreds the paperwork to confetti and flings it to the skies.
- Cold-call solicitation. Reputable agents will sometimes directly approach an author whose work they've seen and liked (and if so, will reference that work). But they don't rely on mass email solicitation to build their client lists.
he has a touch of jaundice, so we've been saying he's in his tanning bed all day today. they have a little pair of goggles for him, too.
The fabric is silk taffeta, flat-lined it with a heavy weight silk organza. The hoops are modern hoopsteel; I would have like to use a natural, period material (such as basket cane) but that was proving to be too much of a pain, so I gave up.
The April playlist was finished yesterday which you can listen to here. I’ve also started May’s playlist. You can listen to that here and though there’s only one song on it, if you subscribe to it, you can see the playlist as it grows (which will often be a couple hours before I write this actual post).
The orthopedist told me to give up the barefoot/minimal endeavors & get to physical therapy.
Of course, not all my conversations in immigrant communities follow this easy pattern. In the wake of 9/11, my meetings with Arab and Pakistani Americans, for example, have a more urgent quality, for the stories of detentions and FBI questioning and hard stares from neighbors have shaken their sense of security and belonging. They have been reminded that the history of immigration in this country has a dark underbelly; they need specific assurances that their citizenship really means something, that America has learned the right lessons from the Japanese internments during World War II, and that I will stand with them should the political winds shift in an ugly direction.
We are all plucking
But J had other ideas. It's now a birdbath. We moved into the yard, found a flatish bowl, weighted it down with rocks and filled it with water.
Beulah Bondi Make Way for Tomorrow
Where the mammoth came to drink;
Me walking to the door - LOCKED. Huh? Argh! I'm normally not that organized and out and about so early! I dropped daughter off at 8:45 at school and it is now 9:05. Store opens at 10:00. Grrrr. I go and get some gas, some coffee and sit in the parking lot. TRYING to enjoy the quiet time but I am obsessed with thinking about what else I COULD be doing.
Hear the music,
Taylor spoke to them, trying to bring comfort and encouragement, but the words stuck in his throat. “Something with me cried, “You hypocrite! telling these unconverted people about a kind and loving father in heaven, and not prepared yourself to trust him without half a crown.’” With nothing to say, Taylor determined to get the visit over quickly so he offered to pray as the man had initially requested. with, ‘Our Father who art in heaven,” than conscience said within, ‘Dare you mock God? Dare you kneel down and call him “Father” with that half-crown in your pocket?’”
Despite the fact that the Cooper Road trail is not terribly exciting, it was a fantastic day. For one, I really needed to just get away. Hiking is such a primeval pursuit - there's just you and the trail and the forest. Cares and worries seem to just slip into the background out on the trail. Secondly, it's always great to get to do something with Duncan. He's so chipper and enthusiastic. I can't tell you how many times he said "I just love to hike..." Music to my ears. He chatters and jumps and walks on fallen trees and peers under rocks and up hollow trees. He points out cool plants or bugs or piles of animal poop (we saw a dung beetle with his ball of poop) and asks what plants are called. His enthusiasm for the simple beauty of the time and place is infectious. And I needed that.
Yesterday the world lost an amazing man, but heaven gained one amazing angel. The man who has been an extra grandfather to me my whole life passed away yesterday, and my heart is full of sadness over the loss. Every time I realize I won't hear his voice again or see his smile brings unbelievable pain. There may have not been blood binding our families together, but he is my grandfather in every other sense of the world. We don't need blood to form the strongest bonds in our world. We need love, and Mr. U had that in abundance.
Our minds connecting to our higher self’s
And yes, the triangles are turned RIGHT! It's a reproduction of a wonky block made wonky on purpose, though several of you have told me to fix it!
I'm really glad I went...cold and all!!!
This is the opposite of the first need. When we feel that we lack something. We want to try other things because we are bored. There are also repercussions you get uncertain, addiction enters when feel we want something different or an option for being discontent and uncertain. We should take control of this require.
We have been lax again in our ritualistic bashing of our many pen pals, we shall endeavour to do it more frequently.
He has an extra scar and a few extra stitches, but once they stop being sore, they will be a war wound for him to boast about I'm sure.
I thought it might be fun to share some statistics, which come from www.vanishingtattoo.com to show the effects tattoos are having on the world in the last decade or so.
Happy April!
What? No. That would be ridiculous. No you will go upstairs into a magical land of unicorns and free ice cream.
Comments: Skunk singing Just a Gigolo. Skunk family lives at home in a happy cult like atmosphere where the song I recognize as "Jesus Loves Me" has it as "Momma Loves Me" (although this is feasibly the original). Cutting the river. It might be amusing to view this as a version of the ringwraiths from Lord of the Rings... And the moral is that even if you're smelly, you can still hook up with a bunny who can't smell. Creepy Southern cat. For some reason I want to say that's what Tennessee Williams looked like (tho this is not bourne out by Google images)... He sings I'll be glad when you're dead you rascal you tho, the Louis Armstrong song from the '32 Fleischer cartoon. In the end tho, the skunk and the rabbit are not allowed to mix. Mirrored pool. "We're not like other folks." Presumably "I've Got a Cold In My Nose" was a hit at the time. The bunny grabs you by the wrist, drags you along, says "c'mon, let's play; you swing me!" then gets her legs up in the air. Good times. Bakshi-esque design on the cat. Interesting but unpleasant repeated cat freak out.
3. Cast your vote by liking, commenting and sharing the picture of your bet.
Still, all the apps felt wrong to me. I wanted my son to have nothing to do with any of them.
In declaring May 20th to be "Everybody Draw Muhammad Day," Seattle artist Molly Norris created a poster-like cartoon showing many objects -- from a cup of coffee to a box of pasta to a tomato -- all claiming to be the likeness of Muhammad.
At 5:30 we walked outside and thought we had been transported to another land.
Cardstock: Chocolate Chip, Sahara Sand, Very Vanilla
Journal tag: Deja Views "Love journal sticker tablet"
and this afternoon, one bloomed!
In college, I destroyed two cars as a pizza delivery boy. Seriously, if you ever want to give a big fuck-you to your bank account, deliver pizzas. Considering it as a viable job opportunity? Save yourself a lot of time and money, smash your transmission with bricks right now and go back to bed. Financially, you've ended up in the same place as you would have if you'd taken the job, and you're better rested to boot.
Also, a note about finding items: Don’t be too worried about finding the exact item you want to use in your room. If they don’t have my exact sofa, I find one that’s similar enough to give me the right look.
I have never had a beer with this level of herbs, so at first I was a bit taken aback, but I quickly warmed to the flavor and went back for a second sample. This is audacious brewing at its best and something I would really like to try again.
There were the goblets full of libation on the Underworld/Death altar, and the usual findings elsewhere… and the rest was for a special trip.
Place the formed wire clasp on the steel block and hit the clasp with the rawhide mallet to harden the metal and prevent the clasp from becoming misshapen.
If around 20% of CMU’s campus population, and campus populations in general, are sexual assault survivors then why don’t we hear about it more often? Why is there a need for a sexual assault awareness month if such a large portion of our society has experienced it first-hand?
Drew: "Well, if I ever *ACCIDENTALLY* ended up in a same-sex marriage, I sure hope that I wouldn't have to be the BRIDE!"
It is SUCH a big deal, being with these pre-school children each day, and seeing them grow and learn and develop. Such a big deal to help settle the rage over a toy car, hug a sad little boy who misses his mum, read to two little girls who are exhausted from running about outside.
When I received a bunch of comments almost immediately, I felt so encouraged.
I'm sure most of you are reading this and shaking your heads in agreement... after all.... most of us got into blogging as an outlet of some sort and those of us who are part of this tight community (or my blogging family... and you know who you are!!!) find that we truly care about each other. I know when a grand baby was born, when a couple is going away for a romantic weekend, when a person in someone's family passes away, when there is a diet to be fought, when there are battles that just aren't worth it anymore... and these friendships have become very important to me... SO how dare someone tell me that you are all not real??? You all seem pretty real to me!!!
Leesha: "Hey, why do you get another dessert?"
I did a fair amount of skating as a kid. Most of it of the 'roller' variety, but the mechanics are essentially the same. But there was plenty of ice skating too. I remember spending many a happy winter afternoon ice skating at the dingy little rink in Murray Park. The place smelled like damp socks, and the fries they served were always soggy and over salted, but I liked it. I think I even took some lessons there at one point. But my childhood recall button is notoriously faulty, so I could be wrong. Still, I swear I remember some sort of skills test, or something...I did well...lady said I was in the wrong class...
The hotel's architect is recognisable for its high-peaked roof topped with an elaborate Gothic minaret, or fleche – a roofline that distinguishes the building as one of the most well-known in New York. The spire top houses the water tank and even has an observation balcony. If you wish to stay there – and it does have some of the best views in New York – part of the building is a hotel. The rest of the 97 residences are co-op apartments, but even these are privileged to receive the full services of the five-star hotel – including hotel maid service twice a day. Imagine that? We'd love a bit of turn-down around here...
William Primrose, viola; Gerald Moore, piano
No one judges him.
The white rectangle with lines is the area for assignments.
‘You’re gonna need a bigger boat’
You might also enjoy these spaghetti squash recipes:
Many constitutional rights, such as freedom of speech, guaranteed by the first amendment, and the right to bear arms, guaranteed by the second, are threatened by this presidency. I personally value the former above the latter, but accept that to revoke either requires a change to the constitution. Could it be that the president has less respect for the constitution because he has already breached it to get where he is?
Are you wet for me, dear?
Then we saw the pale yellow light in the distance and headed that way, even though it seemed the wind and the rain were doing their best to stop us.
I'm excited about this dress because I think it might fit my daughter for oh, maybe three years or so? :) It hits her ankles right now, so she's got plenty of growing room height-wise, and a shirred bodice and tie straps are both so versatile, size-wise. It'll be fun to see how long it lasts.
After MUCH hemming and hawing between both of us, we took the leap and made the purchase (which was not planned). We also got a new mattress and a chair for the desk.
Gone Back to Whoring by Roger Alan Wade
Zell Jinn doesn't do things like a normal teenager would. If he did, he would've met Shyla Franklin at school or online, rather than inside Hell.
Other Pixie Exclusive Disney Vacation Packages:
Free fall. The flying pterosaur
You may not understand the required software, you may not be able to Photoshop the hell out of something, you may only be familiar with the fonts Times New Roman and Courier, you probably don’t know what leading, kerning or typesetting mean but all of that is skill. I didn’t know any of that when I started school either; I learned it.
I found lots of challenges to enter into this week, maybe with more entries I'll have a better chance of winning something :-)
What was said?
The game’s main mystery revolves around “The Terragrigia Panic”, a bio-terrorist attack on a floating city that now lies sunk and destroyed on the ocean floor. The who, what and whys of its decimation are all teased out during the course of the game, but while the story itself isn’t particularly ground-breaking, the game’s almost excessive use of cliff-hangers will ensure that you’re wrapped up in every single secret it has to offer. This is made all the more apparent in the game’s rather unusual structure, as each chapter is broken up into almost TV-sized episodes. Complete with their own “Previously on…” re-cap, they tackle the challenges of maintaining the atmosphere in a handheld survival horror game well, but when some episodes can take at least forty minutes to complete it’s hardly as travel-friendly as a quick dip into Super Mario 3D Land.
I forgot my mittens
Today I had a cheat day. I had pizza (2 slices) for dinner & half a chocolate frappe with Kyle. & I had two chocolates from a chocolate box. I feel quite ill, actually. I've only been focusing on eating healthily for a week, but it's amazing how much of a difference it makes. My favourite snack at the moment is baby carrots with light cottage cheese. I feel like my skin looks better, & I have lost some weight already. But I also just have more energy & I feel so good.
Already on a path to reduce the number of mortgages it buys, Freddie Mac purchased fewer loans in March, reducing its share of the mortgage Freddie Mac Building market as calls to eliminate the government sponsored lender increased in Congress.
My dreams seem silly or unobtainable to most- but I have to keep them and they must remain laced in hope. Sometimes, that's all we can do.
Petra
As much potential as a player may have coming out of the draft , you never want the player to be satisfied with where they are at. This is where coaching comes in. If a team with poor coaching drafts a player with unlimited ability, that player will never reach their full potential. The amount of work we put into coaching and raising up our students matters!
I believe ranking sites like Klout for Twitter and PinClout for Pinterest only add fuel to the fire. I will admit that I checked my Klout score after hearing of it; and, it was a little disheartening. For those studying or practicing social media, a low Klout score can yield a negative effect. Everyone wants to make an impact; but, maybe we should focus on who we impact. Scott Adams said, “You don’t have to be a ‘person of influence’ to be influential. In fact, the most influential people in my life are probably not even aware of the things they’ve taught me.”
These nuns were so sweet, shy, and humble. I reflected on their daily lives in the Tibetan Buddhist world. They don't get many of the privileges afforded to the monks, and their education is often just learning to recite and memorize scripture without the higher teachings of philosophy. Several projects (Kopan Monastery for Nuns in Nepal, and Tenzin Palmo's Dongyu Gatsal Ling Nunnery in north India) have begun to redress this situation, all with the blessings of HH the Dalai Lama.
Tonight I was having a PJ party when these words started to come to my mind so I wrote them down. You will have to be the judge if this is of God or not.
In 1986 the Lawhead family moved to Britain so that Stephen could conduct research for the PENDRAGON CYCLE books. They settled there permanently in 1990, with some years spent living in Austria and a sabbatical in the United States.
avasho ke nai?
The parish council referred to a letter from Willingham Medical Practice, which said demands on their services were “increasing greatly” and that, while it had started extra sessions and employed an extra doctor, “any further increase in capacity is limited by the available resources”.
I nod dully; something tells me a week was more than enough.
It's not cute. It's not funny. It shouldn't be encouraged. That's what a small child perceives when you laugh at that kind of behavior. I'm not advocating snapping her out of the high chair and busting her behind, but saying, "You shouldn't do that," and not effectively praising that behavior would be nice. She's learning that it's okay to be disrespectful of others. Just because you might behave like a redneck heathen doesn't mean that your relatively pretty little daughter should, too. It just makes all of you look like a bunch of boors.
No travel plans for this month, but a few ideas already brewing. We really would like to check out a few more places to move to. U.S. Virgin Islands will probably be our next stop. St. Croix? St. Thomas? St. John? Other than a day cruise stopover, have you spent some time there? Any experiences to share? My son has a friend that just moved to St. Croix and he's planning a trip to visit her and check it out for himself.
I like my own company. Or the company of a good book. Or the radio. Or the t.v. Or my dog who is a good friend.
The United States Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit has proposed to amend its rules to require the filing of a digital version of every brief and appendix filed by a party represented by counsel, unless counsel certifies that submission of a brief or appendix in digital format is not practical or would constitute hardship. The requirements for the filing of paper copies of the briefs and appendices would continue unchanged. Comments must be received by the close of business on February 16, 2007.
.... I'm still here, I have been busy working on the final touches of the book, it's very, very nearly finished a few tweaks here and there and then it's off to the Frankfurt Book fair eek! I have just been on their site and it says.....
I’ve paired fucking with as shit, and fucking with ass, but what about ass with as shit? Sorry, no can do:
I was really impressed with the variety of products the Luxe Box included. Personally, I am a big fan of different fragrances. It is really exciting to test out a bunch of different ones! I am looking forward to trying out all of these different products, and I will be sure to post some reviews once I have.
and Israel and defend us from all our enemies in Jesus Christ Name, Amen!
Just was not ready for something so simple,
Tikaram
in me all that fire is repeated,
4. Bake for 30-35 minutes or until the puffs are golden brown. Allow to cool completely before filling them.
A dominant force in rock music for more than four decades, YES has created some of rock’s most enduring and compelling hits, selling more than 30 million albums worldwide. The group has defined music history with their dynamic instrumental contrasts and abstract lyrics. Their symphonic use of sound and innovative musical styles continues to make them the most successful progressive rock band in history and their amazing career continues to defy many of their rock counterparts.
I have a week of annual leave starting from...now! So I don't have to work until Tuesday 6th April. I have so much planned for the days off, from haircuts to fixing sewing machines to shopping (surprise surprise). I have tickets to Phoenix and the Cuban National Ballet and I plan to do some special gym training sessions as well. Maybe I will even have some time to blog in there somewhere. I just hope I can cope with all the fun-ness.
Most оf thе standard hard drive data recovery services аrе uѕuallу completed wіthіn 2 to 5 days. It іѕ typical however, that prior to thе actual hard drive data recovery, thе technicians will cоnsіdеr an evaluation process. This iѕ basically considered tо diagnose thе problem and tо determine if thе lost data can be retrieved оr not.
Pension plans allows an individual to save in a tax-deferred manner. This plan has two types such as defined contribution plans and defined benefit plans.
It’s only clear if that’s what you want to believe it says. Here’s a direct quote from that same paragraph 30 that he seems to believe is so incriminating: “From the time of its launch, Amazon’s e-book distribution business has been consistently profitable, even when substantially discounting some newly released and bestselling titles.”
While you're a scared little maggot and hide behind your baby.
That is where we come in. As born-again brethren of Jesus, we are called to be the envoys of this message of reconciliation (2 Cor. 5:18) and in order to be His personal envoys the Father places the Holy Spirit within us to conform us to the Image of His Son (Rom. 8:29) so that He may empower us just as he empowered His Son!
but my pasted-up heart is your Gotham.
AK: There’s a sense in which study abroad the old fashioned way — linguistic immersion, home stays, insertion in the French university — is an endangered experience. Many great universities are creating their own campuses in places like Singapore and Abu Dhabi. Others are offering programs in France where all the academic work is done in English. I wanted to remember a golden age of study abroad when we felt we had so much to learn from another country — a time when Americans were taking, rather than giving, the lessons. And when students made a vow to speak no other language than French — even with one another.
She still scored higher than me, though.
I think I made it thirty seconds into the call before I started blubbering.
Today Daisy also stayed in her stall mostly, because it was snowing all day and the driveway wasn't clear enough to ride really... So I thought I would do some mind games with her in her stall, which I had also done Sunday. I had her backing up, walking, standing still while I walked away, squaring up, etc, for pieces of horse treats. Unfortunately, when I attempted a carrot stretch with her, she'd apparently had enough of the working for treats situation, and she lunged at my hand and had it in her mouth before I knew it. She broke skin on one finger, and bit the other right in the joint. No serious injuries, but I felt foolish for hand feeding her when she was obviously not in a patient state of mind, and my fingers hurt a bit now. I think I need to seriously start feeding only with a bowl, at least for awhile, and in those situations.
The outreach program will start at around 8:00 o’clock in the morning up to 5:00 o’clock in the afternoon in the following barangays and on the following dates:
Young people drink drinks that have pretty colours and fruity flavours like soft drinks but are about 6% alcohol, or pretty, pleasant tasting cocktails. At the same time the hypnotic music pounds away disorientating them. There are often TV screens all around showing sport, pop acts or models on catwalks. This bar had a couple of bouncy castles upon which customers bounced gleefully, mindless that outside their bubbles of pleasure there is a dangerous, hostile world. Recent bomb attacks were outside London nightclubs. A cool bar is unreal and like being in a dream. There is also the use of the hallucinatory effects of drugs in adverts. I saw an advert for vodka shots, which was a square of undulating shades of blue light. You do not see these colours by drinking vodka, gulps of air or not. You see this by taking ecstasy.
Essentially, Mein Herr is helping me achieve something I have been attempting to do since I was in high school. I have been writing the same damn book for eight years and this is why, when I think about the fact that it is now in the editing stages, I want to scream an endless howl of happiness. I started writing this thing in school, but, naturally, I didn’t have the discipline for it, too many emotional upheavals and feelings that the world was going to end, distracted me from completing the book. In my first year of university, I finally had it close to completion (about 70% up to my standard) and my laptop was stolen from my flat in Hatfield. This would be the point in my life where I learned the hard way about the importance of backing up my own information. So I proceeded to rewrite the entire novel in its haphazard, unfinished beauty and backed it up on an old laptop (which was completely useless but for a working hard drive), which I hid in a laundry box under a pile of clothes and linen. Of course, that was a bust…. Three years later, in a new apartment, thieves broke in and stole the new laptop AND the old laptop. I still have no idea how they managed to find it… Bastards. Typically, of course, the book was over 70% complete again. 70, 000 words.
Written in 2009 Going Too Far was the third young adult romance she’d ever written; the first two being Major Crush and The Boys Next Door, which are both romantic comedies. Echols also writes adult romantic comedies.
I did fall for a man, before him, but he did not like my ordinary self. He said he loved me, but I quickly learned that love for him is just a word. He betrayed my love, and kept doing so for one whole year. I thought it drove me mad, but I did not know madness back then. I had not known it, yet.
I don’t know much about Police work. I suspect that few of us outside the criminal justice system do.
Livin' In The Sunlight, Lovin' In The Moonlight
it hides its death in my cinched
Make it more beautiful
We might have given the nod to the official go-to gal of Roxie's World, Secretary of State Hillary Rodham Clinton, who had a brilliant week this week, achieving "late-breaking adoration" and "pop cultural ascendancy" -- in addition to the global domination she has enjoyed for the past few years -- by being cool enough to catch the wave of the Hill-arious Texts From Hillary meme launched by Adam Smith and Stacy Lambe. (That's the final image in the series there on the left, with Mme Secretary's actual texts to the site's creators. Here's the concluding "thanks for the meme-eries" message from Smith and Lambe.) How good was Clinton's week? WaPo declared her the Internet's "new queen of cool." Jezebel gushed that she had managed to "make herself seem even more badass than she already was. Well played, Hillz." Shoot, even the execrable Maureen Dowd, whose psychotic anti-Clinton ravings during the 2008 primary battle earned her this blog's undying enmity, had a nearly nice column on Clinton's "newly cool image," though she couldn't resist tossing off a couple of gratuitous digs -- e.g., saying that the pictures that launched the meme make Clinton look, "as Raymond Chandler would say, . . . 'as inconspicuous as a tarantula on a slice of angel food.'" Ah, MoDo, you never disappoint.
I read a few updates from iPhone users who either deleted or are deleting InstaDM, me included, simply because it makes no sense or it’s confusing, and they can’t privately send photos to each other without it being on their Instagram feed. So other than ‘chatting’ there really isn’t much more InstaDM has to offer at this point.
And finally, my favorite group on Royal. I don’t know if it’s because of the singer’s personality or because of the tourists dancing in the street or because of the excellence in music. All three, really.
So the names, in no particular order: are:
All rural places like ours have their share of characters, they don’t always seem to do very much, but they certainly add a little flavor to the general community. Over a period I have written a few little stories around our guy Bob he‘s been quite the entertainer.
My most recent tangent away from Curse of the Blood Stone occurred while watching a typical adventure movie. The hero and his sidekick rescue a beautiful damsel and foil the antagonist's plans. Granted, the beautiful damsel in this case was brainy and resourceful. But the little lightbulb went on and I asked, what if...?
Mr.Rajiv Vastupal president AIMA, Dr. J S Juneja Chairman task force MSME AIMA, Dr H P Kumar Chairman and MD NSIC Ltd and Mr. M Narendra Chairman & MD IOB kicked off the program by giving us an overview of the intent of the convention. Following the inaugural session we had four interesting panels of speakers each one addressing a specific aspect which was critical to making MSMEs globally competitive. Mr. Subrahmanyam of IOB made a short but informative pitch from the banker’s perspective on availability of credit. His thoughts on availability of funding options were interesting.
It was so simple to assemble and after just a few minutes in the oven it came out beautiful!! Sorry I didn't snap a pic, the kids and hubby dove in so quick it was almost gone before I got a slice. Let me tell y'all, it was amazing!!!! I will never make regular pancakes or french toast again!!! Do yourself a favor and head over to Justin's blog and make this recipe!!
I hope this helps!
Just So You Know... I have a new set of hero's, 500 to be exact. 500 elderly people who refused to be evacuate during Irene, No, I do not condone them for not evacuating but I do admire them for standing their ground. The last I saw of them they were huddled in an apartment drinking ripple.
I received a copy of Snow Leopard in the mail so that I can move my MobileMe account to iCloud. A Snow Leopard 10.6.3 DVD and a thick multi-language Software License Agreement booklet are packed in a brown padded envelope.
When One person dies
I have an addiction for which there’s no twelve-step program or support group, making my hope of recovery dismal at best. People sometimes ask me how my addiction got started. Like most addictions, I suspect – in one brief moment of weakness. I thought, “Hey, I’ll give it a try. Everyone’s doing it.” I didn’t see the harm in trying it, and I rationalized that I could stop whenever I wanted. And in that one moment of keyboard experimentation, my emoticon addiction was born.
Today is Andrew's birthday, and he says he's had a good day despite having to go to school on his birthday! He didn't want anyone to know it was his birthday today, but one of his friends knew and told their teacher, so Andrew had to stand up at the front of the room during Assembly for everyone to sing Penblwydd Hapus to him (he was very embarassed apparently - aawww!).
Yes, I would love to read to the children but being a library grandparent didn’t seem that grand to me. Don’t get me wrong, I want to be a grandparent….one day! Maybe, twenty years from now! Sahana, are you reading this? Anyway, to show I wasn’t really that old, I said, ’I can only volunteer during the morning hours since that is the time my son is in PRESCHOOL!
The items included:
Enjoy the planning, the goal setting and the dreams, but don't forget to give thanks for our present.
In a fascinating study of the Yale secret society Skull and Bones, Antony Sutton uncovered numerous aspects of profound importance about this one society. In his book America’s Secret Establishment – An Introduction to the Order of Skull & Bones, Sutton points out there is a set of “Old Line American Families and New Wealth” that dominates The Order (of Skull & Bones) – the Whitney family, the Stimson family, the Bundy family, the Rockefeller family, the Harriman family, the Taft family, the Bush family, and so on. He also points out that there is a British connection:
John is loving his new light-filled, colorful office!
What Reagan did isn’t really that different from what Obama is doing. Reagan’s version of the Recovery Act was to cut the crushing income taxes the country was under across the board (the top tax rate was initially cut from 70% to 50%, while the middle class also received huge tax relief), but the net result was the same: money went to the economic stimulus at the expense of the federal government’s coffers, meaning that the government had a huge budget shortfall. Reagan fired the PATCO workers in what was deemed an unprecedented federal intervention and abuse of power (and arguably putting the air transportation industry’s safety in jeopardy for a time period). Even with the decreased federal coffers, Reagan felt it essential to ratchet up the country’s spending on defense in an attempt to outspend the Soviet Union and ultimately end the Cold War, but at a price that was astronomical (and with no guarantee of success at the time).
The CPM-700 is a broadband receiver that can detect and locate major types of electronic surveillance devices including room, telephone, body bugs, video transmitters, and some tape recorders. The CPM-700 provides a very important effective tool for professional sweep teams, government security personnel, and private citizens with important security needs.
God has promised you hope, life, restoration and a future. Begin to receive His provision of joy and strength today. Seek Him and pray.
5/30 - Far from the Madding Crowd (1967)
I recall when Americans in the deep south used to burn books – this was to prevent the young being led astray. The book burners wanted the books destroyed completely, so nobody would ever read that ‘thing’ again.
1 giant
My mom’s journey with cancer has had its moments of fear and hope; as she went into surgery (that was possibly to take her life, though might have given her longer life) then came out, after exploratory surgery said it couldn’t be done. She has decided to just let it be and enjoy life for as long as she can.
Of course we all are aware of one of the biggest problems in craft beer, which is the constant battle against macro brands for shelf space, tap space and market share. The film Beer Wars gave us an in-depth glimpse into these issues, but occasionally we still get harsh reminders of how our respective craft beer 'Davids' are constantly battling the macro 'Goliaths'. Most recently, a news story hit where a Flying Dog rep in Washington D.C. alleged that MillerCoors had paid a bar to remove a Flying Dog draft line and replace it with a MillerCoors brand. While the claim was later redacted, stories like this still bring to light major issues that smaller breweries across the nation face constantly. Similarly, we as consumers face ethical issues when it comes to purchasing and accessing the products we want.
What I'm talking about is ideals. The concepts that we have about food, nutrition, diet, longevity, etc. The dogma that claims one diet, food, lifestyle, or theory of eating is far superior to every other. Omnivorous diet vs. vegetarianism vs. vegan diet. Raw food vs. cooked food. High fruit vs. high fat. Eat more of one thing and completely omit another. The list goes on...and...on...and...on...ad infinitum.
(Rock steady, rock steady, what it is)
Joe Jackson - Westwood
I read Chalmers as writing in a Berkleyan spirit. John Locke elaborated a system of various “properties.” There were primary properties, the essential physical properties of the object; secondary properties, the causal properties of the object such that it caused the mental representation to be as it was; and tertiary properties, the properties of the representation (Locke would say “impression”). In other words a fairly messy tangle. Berkeley, whose views appear strange when presented out of context, made what was in fact a common-sense (and thoroughly empiricist) suggestion: if the mental representation (the “idea”) is the only thing that we, in actual fact, experience, and there is an intractable problem about the relationship between the idea and the “material world,” why don’t we cut the Gordian knot by simply saying that ideas are constitutive of the world, and be done with the problematic “matter” altogether? After all we can only know about the ideas. So let’s just call our ontology “idealism” and move on. Chalmers’ move is very similar: embrace mind-body dualism so that we can forget about it.
Here's some cute DT inspiration for you.
Both the cardinal and the falcon are birds, so this could be a close one. When they’re not hopping around among your azaleas, it’s important to remember that cardinals also serve in a prominent position within the Catholic Church, where their power is second only to that of the pope. I pick the Cardinals over the Falcons in this week’s Upset Special.
Hardback Upgrade
OURS: Now it's your turn! What homemaking tips do you have today? Can't wait to see!
Then Thorkel the Wealthy spoke and said: “This business that we have in hand is little worth. We will send and tell you as soon as we need your help.”
For her bead dog sculpture, Gothard wanted to reflect the images of Medieval History. She created a design that uses bold colors and vibrant images, which will be featured on the dog she calls “Saints at Home.”
I know my posts have been a bit too sporadic in the past few months. This time I have no reasons... I don't know what's been keeping me from crafting. Busy, yes, but not sooo busy that I can't craft. Anyway, here is what I have to share with you today:
I honestly believe that while watching this series, I began to actually over-think things. I was left with thoughts of just to whom the show was marketed. It is so obviously a show for young adults, most of the main characters are in High School. A lot of the action revolves around the school, and many of the themes relate to teenage life and feelings.
Also- I have a dermatologist appt on the 19th. I found a black spot on my birthmark that is on my back. I am worried about it because I always "inspect" it to make sure it's not changing shape, color, size. The doctor is going to do a biopsy of it, please say a prayer for me. I am really worried.
The worst problems have been at the Chinese takeaway, Man Lee, which is suffering at the hands of yobs. Paul Van Looey, independent councillor for St Luke’s, said: “A couple of weeks ago they got some racial abuse, and then kids came along lobbing milkshakes at the window. They are a bit scared.” And what’s being done about it?
This nurse was sickened. She had always been told, and had counseled hundreds of women, that the baby wouldn't feel anything, that it wouldn't be aware of what was happening. Yet on this screen, the evidence proved otherwise.
Tonya Watts
That titular role is that of Bernie Tiede, the local mortician in the small town of Carthage, Texas, who was one of the most beloved citizens around because of his absolutely willingness to always lend his neighbors a helping hand with tremendous ease. And one day Bernie befriended a woman with the total opposite attitude of his, Marjorie Nugent, a super wealthy widow with a sour outlook on the world. Yet they became great friends, and Nugent eventually trusted Bernie with everything in her life. Until her increasing demands one day became enough, and even though Bernie still ran her errands around town, the wealthy widow wasn’t actually seen around.
3. During our trek across the DFW Metroplex, we also stopped into the new-ish Catholic bookstore in Plano: Two Hearts (I can’t find a link). It’s located relatively close to my office, except that I work mostly at home these days. Anyway, in the back of the store, they have a nativity set up including dress up clothing for the kids. I loved seeing Princess dressed up as Mary holding the baby Jesus doll.
Born 1927 in what is now Zambia. Father, British colonial civil servant; mother from South African farming family. Three brothers – he’s the second. Family returned to England when he was 7, but his father died the same year. Very little money, but he was privately educated at boarding schools, thanks to generosity of relatives. Scholarship to Eton. Briefly conscript in British army just after World War 2. Then Cambridge University, then 17 years working for the British humour magazine, Punch. Published his first two books, an adult detective story and a children’s SF adventure, in 1968, and from then on has been a full-time writer. Has been nine times on the Carnegie Medal short list and won it twice, as well as other major prizes. In l952 married his first wife, and they had two daughters and two sons. He now has six grandchildren. His first wife died in 1988, and two years later he married Robin McKinley. They live in a small Hampshire town with a couple of lurchers.
representing the Executive
“Right here, doctor,” she said in a voice made husky by the long nights she was on call, tending to the various South American fauna needs of our patients. “But are you sure a llama is . . . appropriate?”
Suddenly this reality changes. The plants have availed themselves to me effortlessly and with no cost. The journeys become increasingly frequent and are always solo.
I’m tired of having this debate. I’m tired of being forced to defend myself and my fellow women believers at every turn. I’m tired of being angry at the injustice. I’m tired of being disappointed at the realization that, yet again, it’s really all about fear of sharing power, fear of losing control, fear that the truth may not be quite so neat and tidy after all.
Next Issue: The man who won't stop talking, a woman who can't start talking, and the plot device that won't die.
HOWEVER…today I had an epiphany…because I work in a cluttered mess, I never finish my projects. So now that my work area looks like this:
Then you can either cut out the pattern
The winner of last weeks blog candy is
I did not go to yard sales this weekend. But I had a few things to share from last weekend. I hope you all enjoy viewing my junk!!
Something fun to share:: Hubs got an Iphone. And... I've been loving playing the Fruit ninja. Anyone else have a small addiction to busting up some fruit kung fu style?! :)
Yes, there are going to be many things I miss about Spain, but the grass is always greener on the other side.
Could you email me ( email addy in my profile) Lorraine, with your addy, it's all parceled up and ready to post. Congratulations hun.
Since finishing my Rabbit Box at Easter, I decided that I would work on something else that's been calling my name. You may remember Isabella Johnstone? I'm stitching her with the called for Belle Soies on 40ct Vintage Lentil. And I've really been enjoying her (despite having to rip out her entire right hand side border and restitch it). And I'm excited to finally be getting into some colors other than red and green!
The pleasantest surprise.
Yet another not very stretchable human limit is in our ability to tolerate or adapt to change. Change of course is a constant of earthly life. You can’t step twice into exactly the same river, nor can you live two successive moments in exactly the same place. And always in human history there have been costly or catastrophic sudden changes. But with relentless fanfare, at the cost of almost indescribable ecological and social disorder, and to the almost incalculable enrichment and empowerment of corporations, industrialists have substituted what they fairly accurately call “revolution” for the slower, kinder processes of adaptation or evolution. We have had in only about two centuries a steady and ever-quickening sequence of industrial revolutions in manufacturing, transportation, war, agriculture, education, entertainment, homemaking and family life, health care, and so-called communications.
Again in Mood Tides, Dr. Horton says of the emotional ups and downs we face, “But if emotional variation is inevitable, spiritual variation is not. Satan delights to attack us at the extremes of our emotional cycles as well as at seasons of life that push us up or down. He need not succeed. We can resist him better if we understand that it is not the extremes themselves but what we do with them that brings about spiritual victory or defeat. We can condemn their indulgent states, pride, and despair, without condemning the fluctuations themselves. For elation and depression are normal moods intended for good. They are moods, it is true, which some must endure as acute and chronic infirmities. Yet they may be endured like other infirmities with the assurance that God can turn suffering to positive gain. There is divine purpose in the rhythms of life.”
For fans of: Dirty Projectors, The Books, Braids
3) I suggest the Dallas Mavericks @ Atlanta Hawks and Denver Nuggets @ Minnesota Timberwolves
Yeah, I know. She was only 10 month's old.
Created for YOU - summer wear for women, accessories, totes, etc
So on that note…I’m off to do just that…freak the neighbours out lolly stylee!!
But what do I really know, I can think. And I do think that using commercial strategies to stand up to any commercial religion, is very fair play, as long as objective good and tolerance prevails.
So why do YOU return ebooks?
Gansberg is a mad scientist with sour beers, and he has a bunch of different esperiments fizzing and burping in different barrels. The Apricot, however, is built on a base of his tripel (the Kriek and Blackberry start out as lower-gravity Flanders Red)--unique, I believe, among his sour ales. As a result, the beer is deeper, more supple, and far less sour than others in his lineup (not that there's anything wrong with that). After visiting the brewery last Spring, I wrote:
But I'm feeling the need to create again and I've been thinking of hosting an apron swap. However I'm not sure if there would be any interest. I there is I'll be more than happy to get one started. Let me know.
Alas, it was not to be. He just wouldn't get into it. His swallower seemed to be broken. He choked every time, and this would usually lead to a vasovagal response, which means that his heart rate dropped to almost nothing and he would basically pass out. This is not an enjoyable experience and so he started to hate to eat. It was much more convenient to be fed through the nose. He even started playing opossum so that we would leave him alone, or he'd just pretend to suck. We call this an oral aversion and had it really taken hold, it would have made life not an enjoyable experience, so we backed off and started being very careful to let him take the lead. Then we tried thickening up his milk with banana baby food, which made it easier for him to figure out what to do with all the liquid in his mouth. We took it very slowly. We waited until it was his idea.
A CHUNK OF MY HAIR.
- Gaslton Gorge, a big gorge with a steep 4km climb out
Friday morning, the day of the surgery, I was up and showering by 5:15 am (Freaking early, I know!). My ride (mom and her bf) picked me up at 6:15 and we headed out for our 45 minute drive to the doctor's office. We arrived a few minutes early and waited in the car. As soon as we went inside, however, they were ready and immediately started processing paperwork. I had to sign a few consent forms and HIPPA forms and I was on my way. The nurse took me back and looked at my eyes with two more devices. She explained everything she was doing in detail and how the information she was gathering will help them program the laser to make the most accurate adjustments to my vision. I believe one a corneal topographer which measures the curvature of the eye and creates a colorful kind of "map" of the cornea. There was also a wavefront analysis machine that sends light waves through the eye to provide an even more precise map of aberrations affecting the vision. All of that was easy stuff.
11 Five Knuckle Shuffle 6:49
ME: What can I do for you?
Welcome :)
One of my gifts was this lovely antique decanter box with beautiful burr walnut and rosewood banding veneers and a brass (?) and mother of pearl inlay on the top. The box originally held six bottles and glasses, but due to a family fued, those were divided amongst the heirs, and the box was left empty and sold.
He planned, prepared, and then he left. And the rest, as they say, is history.
At the bottom of your comment section of your blog there's:Links to this post What does that mean?
collapsed, leading to the
"I think children need much more than they have of opportunities to come into contact with adults who are seriously doing their adult thing, not just hanging around entertaining or instructing or being nice to children. They also need much more than they have of opportunities to get away from adults altogether and live their lives free from other people's anxious attention."
Tomato, 1 pc, cut onto four
Sigh.
. . . salad bar at Ruby Tuesdays - don't even start with me about this, heh!
...for my FRIENDS, both personal and virtual. You guys keep me going! Your stories, your lives, your beauty, your kindnesses...I will be forever grateful for your friendship.
H/T to Darth Bacon
2 Samuel 22:4, 47, 50–I will call upon the LORD, who is worthy to be praised;
Putting out the Free Reads was a very positive and rewarding experience. I received a lot of feedback, and after adding the newsletter signup to the end of my stories, I've gotten people I don't know who want to be kept in the loop as to my future releases.
*I have to make a preface apology for the low quality and darkness of the pictures in the following posts. My scanner is not big enough for these drawing so I had take photos with my camera in not the best of lighting. Sorry, it’ll just have to do.
So to recap, hone in on the architecture and the complimentary landscape style. And "see" your chosen plants in a form that fits in with your scheme. Did this help you? Do you feel better informed when visiting the garden center? Any questions? Yes I used to teach landscape design and am used to asking at the end, "any questions?" But I am serious, ask away!
If you hang around booze geeks long enough, eventually you find yourself discussing a topic that's become a perennial favorite: what kinds of stuff you used to drink before you got turned onto a wider spectrum of adult beverages. (Despite what they'd have you believe, in their youth, cocktail nerds weren't sneaking off into the woods to make Negronis or lounging around the frat house basement trying to find the perfect Singapore Sling recipe).
I am not saying that it was part of God’s original plan that we go through dark times. In our Wednesday night adult Bible study, we have been going through the book of Isaiah. In our studies, we have seen time and time again where God has pronounced judgment on the people of Israel and her enemies. And time and time again there are prophecies of judgment to come in the end-times. And when God hands down judgment against the people who do not follow Him, you can count on it not being a good thing. But God does not “want” to hand down these hard consequences on the people. His desire is to be in a relationship with us, God as our Abba-Father to us, His beloved children. We see evidence of that by his offer of salvation through Jesus Christ, and His grace and mercy to those who repent and turn back to Him.
The rest of the afternoon was spent looking through the photographs, taking photos with my phone of some memorable photographs within the albums, mainly of times before my birth and after.
Later that night he took me down the street to The Bunratty. That pub opened my callow brain to the wonders of traditional Irish music. Back in Wexford jigs and reels were nailed to the floor and drained of their vigor by very nice and proper musicians; in the wild North West of the Bronx traditional music was unhinged and unfettered, mad as the mist and snow.
A post punk collective hailing from Budapest that you probably will never have heard of but should’ve. Their debut EP was released late last year through island def jam and and is definetely worth getting as it’s a mix of alternative indie rock tunes that are just generally very good and have been played by the likes of Jarvis Cocker, if that isn’t great enough for you then really, what are you doing with your life?
Wow, Wow, Wow...just WOW! I finished reading this last night but felt I needed to sleep on it before I could write my review. It's morning now and I am still no closer to being able to do this book justice.
6. Draw a long oval shape touching the left side of the big oval near the top.
The MPB Men's Boxers Sew-Along will begin on Monday, October 3 and will run for approximately two weeks.
It was all set to the primal rhythm of a steady thumping backbeat complemented by a bass line hitting you everywhere. It caused dancing of the simplest pattern; hop hop, switch foot, hop hop, switch foot, hop hop; arms swinging back and forth in time to the movement of the always bouncing feet. The grass was bright and green and standing when the man next to me started dancing this basic jungle influenced sway. By mid concert he had danced the grass flat, by nights end, to mud.
It’s been a year of new beginnings for me. A lot has changed and I have many new chapters coming up soon. It is all sort of scary, but exciting at the same time. For the first time in a long while, I feel like my life is actually moving. I think back a couple years and I can’t say much that I’ve accomplished. I’ve stayed in college and have received good grades, but starting a career is something completely different. I’m just happy to be able to really begin my photography life.
Words ain't no throwaway line to me and I can't use them as no fucking game.
Best Norelco Bg2020 Review
What? The mind knows not.
Movies, music and books
I would also like to add that our winner this month will also be offered a Guest Designer position for the month of March.
The servicer could withdraw approval of a short sale if the circumstances on which the sale was approved changed and proceed with a foreclosure sale.
Many people have attempted to tear apart the liens against the twelve Federal Reserve banks that were posted in our previous update.
The "SHOPPING" aspect of Flourishes may take a bit of time to work properly for everyone. For example, I am seeing everything as it is supposed to be, but some folks may not have everything working smoothly. The internet takes a while for new information to "populate" to web servers throughout the country and the world.
Jack Ross / Smithyman Goes Online / 60
2) The Eye gag - this one is more creative because it just comes out of nowhere. When I show the clip at festivals, the hand gag gets smiles, but the eye gag gets huge laughs. it's less expected.
Emotional stress can trigger many different dermatoses, including certain itching rashes. Hypnosis has been helpful in treating atopic dermatitis, itching, psoriasis, hives, and other dermatoses.
Style: American Double/Imperial IPA
And so things went. Amazon grew and Barnes & Noble got in the act. And it was such a cozy nice thing. Everyone was happy. The party kept going on and on. Except, there is always an "except" right? Except Amazon realized that this was really just the first step. While the others were working on the salad, Amazon got up, excused itself and went back to the office.
Berenson
14: Hell hath no fury like…
A woman like me has to admit, even if my life for the past decade had been all puppy dogs and roses, the wanderer and bohemian in me would have started nagging in an increasingly louder voice inside my brain for something different, for a change. I know myself too well to blame it solely on circumstance. Instead of trying to fight that part of my personality, I have just accepted it. What a damn relief. I have to keep moving, and that doesn't mean blowing apart everything that is good right along with the bad. It means allowing yourself continuous evolvement without guilt.
I had these little pearls and beadcaps sitting around for awhile, wanted to make earrings. This is them, all grown up:
It slowly and gradually impairs vision. Like the dreaded disease, cancer, it has no cure and it commonly shows no signs in the early stages nor painful symptoms. Moreover, a small number of patients with glaucoma also experience episodes of eye pain, blurred vision, redness, headache, vomiting, and seeing rainbows around lights.
The other clue that it's not an award is the "prize". A year of representation. A prize you can't decline if you "win". We have words for prizes like that here in NYC. It rhymes with Scooby and it's full of doo doo too.
another girlfriend saying that ‘everyone wants a piece of me’.
And it all started with a “pitch” to an editor I studied and wrote specifically for just as Patronized Artists wrote for their Patrons.
What if the Downtown Brooklyn rezoning had been scrutinized more carefully, including the failure to include affordable housing?
Anakin Skywalker was a real wimp as a kid, wasn't he?
My eyes smile, as well as the curves on my mouth.
Line a 13x9 pan with tin foil and grease the tin foil with Crisco. Cooking spray doesn't work as well as Crisco.
EDWARD F. SYLVIA, M.T.S. Philosopher/Theologian Edward F. Sylvia attended the School of Visual Arts in New York and received his Master of Theological Studies at the Pacific School of Religion in Berkeley, CA and a Certificate of Swedenborgian Studies from the Swedenborgian House of Studies. He is a member of the Center for Theology and the Natural Sciences (C.T.N.S.) and the Swedenborg Scientific Association (S.S.A.). Author of “Sermon From the Compost Pile: Seven Steps Toward Creating An Inner Garden,” his next book “Proving God” will fulfill a continuing vision that God’s fingerprints of love can be found everywhere in the manifest universe.
This is the closest call yet. It’s currently 4:46pm on Wednesday. I don’t intend to let that happen again. But it will anyway. I know myself.
But this was probably my favorite find of the day. I almost walked right past it because it was buried under about 10 things. I just happened to see a little piece of the fabric petal sticking out. When I uncovered this pot of vintage fabric flowers I ran to find Nester!
Willard separates discipleship into a “golden triangle” that makes up three aspects of discipleship. Faithful acceptance of daily problems, spiritual disciplines, and interaction with God’s spirit, are all “connected” and one cannot “take the place of any other”. Furthermore, these points are “all three together in one grand statement” to the Philippians:
us Kin coffee-loving denizens criminally deprived of that daily
What contextual indicators suggest the sophisticated nuances in relation to the definitions you have here presented in support of a partite kingdom? In other words, what about the use of “kingdom” in Daniel 2 or 7 indicates the kingdom is in heaven and what about the use of “kingdom” in Matthew 25:34 indicates it is not in heaven?
And Karzai is worse
Tokidoki Quads in Bastardino(Green) and Palpettina(Pink)
Mix together the following in a food processor
Divakaruni is the author of the Brotherhood of the Conch trilogy (The Conch Bearer, The Mirror of Fire and Dreaming and Shadowland). I have read the first two, and have the final book on order. They are the story of Anand, a boy who encounters an elderly man in the streets of Kolkata in The Conch Bearer . The old man is a healer, on a mission with the magical conch; he is being followed by an evil magician intent on co-opting the power of the conch for his own ends, and Anand and a street sweeper called Nisa must help defend the conch. The journey from Kolkata to the Himalayas and the adventures the trio encounter are a fairly traditional quest story, but the Indian setting is beautifully evoked, and Anand in this novel has few powers of his own. However the Hindu aspect of the story makes it stand out; the Himalayas of course are the home of the gods, and a mongoose helps Anand and Nisha at one point of the book. A Hindu god is represented as a mongoose in art.
Le’s go a-visitin’ back to Griggsby’s Station –
on May 10, 2005 regarding "Patent Examination vs. Patent Prosecution:"
Shoes: Marc by Marc Jacobs
As a proud Beach resident, I am always reminding people of the unexplored joys of The Beach. While my neighborhood is technically called the Outer Sunset, I think that the neighborhood is so dominated by The Beach that its entire identity is eclipsed by it. With the hills jutting up from the Beach, almost every household has a view of the Pacific. You need to get over a dozen blocks away from The Beach to avoid getting sand blown into your house. The onshore winds likewise blow the sound of the pounding surf up the hills into open windows. The Beach is everywhere, and amidst the cool cafes, parks, and cultural vibes, it’s the best and most definitive part of the area.
Cline also said she was unprepared and had not read(!!) 800 pages of evidence given to her after Thanksgiving . . .
It’s a return to form. Totally fresh and original it isn’t, but seeing as it sources Covey in his prime, one cannot go far wrong. Hardcore Covey fans will love this. The newly interested should go here first, and maybe approach The 7 Habits and his other nine titles if they find Covey a sufficiently engaging guru. Many do. He’s got an enormous fan base, because he’s doing something right. And he’s been doing it for over 20 years.
Thanking Him for allowing me to right my wrongs ... again and again.
wreck the party’s chances in the fall
Slate tile scrubbed, cleaned,sealed and ready to grout.
Synospsis- Twelve people. Twelve star signs.
At any rate, I wanted to continue with my blessings list, beginning with #91. If you haven't heard about One Thousand Gifts, be sure to visit Ann Voskamp's website and see what it's all about. The basic premise is that we all have so many blessings in our lives each and every day. Her writings are an inspiration!
I hadn’t heard of Lydia before and when I heard her name, I thought she was country crooner Patty Loveless’ daughter or something. This is incorrect – Lydia hails from Columbus OH (not what I think of as a country music bastion), but has channeled a raw country, tonk sound that certainly is a really good time.
5 read
This week is the kick off to Holiday Parties, Christmas shopping and festive decorating! Tis the season to glam it up, sip cinnamon martinis, and shop for the ones we love!
Gavin – has hustler parents who used to go door to door to land him gigs? Wow. Gavin is exactly the kind of person I watch this show to see. A ‘name’ that has NO dancing experience, and is dedicated to learning and progressing every week. I dont expect that everyone is going to get 10′s and standing O’s in the first week… it’s not a professional dance competition. He gets better and more confident week after week, and this was his best week so far!
BSS: "I didn't."
the same pony that ran him off from the food.
By Vivian Tan in Nairobi, Kenya
Paint is always my first go-to fix when I’m on a strict design budget. You know I love color and my views on painting a front door are no different! Go bold and stand out! Everyone has a white door. Some of my favorite doors in the neighborhood are black, British racing green, pink, fire engine red and coral!
The group warns against over-reliance on markets but instead urges politicians to listen and learn from how poor communities all over the world see the problems of energy, water, food and livelihoods as interdependent and integrated as part of a living ecosystem.
And at last I like what I see.
He told BBC London radio: "I think that I've got a contribution to make in relation to public office, I've always felt that.
People love it when the cocky swaggering I’m-top-of-the-league-me type gets pipped right at the end.
such an imbecilic rifle!
In short, The Grifter’s Hymnal points to heaven but rocks like hell.
Beunka Adams is imprisoned on the Polunsky Unit of Texas death row for a crime that another man confessed to committing. He was convicted and sentenced to death at the age of 21. Beunka was involved in a robbery in which store employee, Kenneth Vandever, was shot and killed.
Such a strategy would not be without its risks. It would openly acknowledge that Wildrose is not only an irritant but an equal foe. It would also admit that the PC’s long-held position as Alberta’s great big tent party, able to accommodate everyone from the centre to the right, had ceased to be, and that is was now firmly a centrist party. The essence of such an appeal would not be “we’re the Tories, we are where the power is at”, which was the case in the past, but rather “we’re the Tories, the option for centrist voters in a new urban, cosmopolitan Alberta, and not those wacky Wildrosers” (by the way, I’m not sure what moniker is applied to Wildrose supporters). The proposed strategy would signal the end of the PC’s four-decade reign as the default governing party of Alberta and make it known to all that even the PCs know this. It would openly rebrand the PCs as a more philosophically defined party competing for power in a competitive political arena. If successful, such a move would see the Liberals obliterated as a centrist option and their support fold into the PCs, who would face the NDP to their left and Wildrose to their right. As Wildrose demonstrates a real ability to threaten the PC hold on power, the Alberta Tories may very well have only the above option left as a means of survival.
As someone who believes we all have a social responsibility to our communities, and this includes our planet, we should be all making a concerted effort to limit the damage of Climate Change, and prevent it.
Well I found Send Out Cards. I haven’t missed a birthday in 4 months (that is a world record for me). I have even sent gifts or gift cards along with the birthday cards. AND best part, I didn’t have to leave my house to buy any of it or mail any of them.
This isn’t about the kind of conch (pronounced “konk”) we find all around The Bahamas. This is not about that staple of island life (and a staple that’s so popular—but not necessarily so prevalent these days—that it may well need some common sense seasonal protection to bring it back to a state of plentifulness, but that’s another story!). No, this is not about the beautiful pink-lipped mild conch that lives in the grassy sea banks of The Bahamas and tastes great in conch salad, fritters, or pounded thin, battered and fried into cracked conch (can you tell it’s around lunchtime as I type this?) …
Another source of tension is the Egyptian government's treatment of minorities, especially Christians. Christians and Muslims have clashed numerous times over land, family and women in the past several years. While many Muslim Egyptians will openly profess their love for their Christian brothers and vice versa, some trouble is inevitable when religion is bound up in the state.
Robin: Right now I'm in love with Donald Harington who is the best undiscovered American magical realist. In the past I've been in love with Sharon Olds, Chuck Palahniuk, Philip K. Dick, Mary Gaitskill, Walt Whitman, Mike Topp. I'm fickle that way.
Nietzsche admits it almost-openly when he says that a priest must”fight shrewdly, hard, and secretly against the anarchy and self-dissolution which start up all the time within the herd, in which that most dangerous explosive stuff and blasting material, ressentiment, is constantly piling and piling up…the priest is the person who alters the direction of ressentiment”.
Skittles isn’t the first popular food brand to find itself at the center of a major controversy. The term “don’t drink the Kool-Aid,” has its origins in the 1978 mass suicide in Jonestown, Guyana, where Reverend Jim Jones led more than 900 members of the Peoples Temple to drink a grape flavored drink laced with cyanide.
It is more than obvious today that taking Manning first was the right pick, but there has never been a more stark contrast between first and second. Number one becomes a league MVP and Super Bowl winner, number two is shortly out of the league, and facing constant legal problems (a new low: getting arrested twice in four days this week for two separate burglaries).
The church is needing, badly, a different scorecard–one that is focused outside the comfort zone of congregations. It reminds me of Joel Barker’s explanation of a paradigm shift. What fades away (with much pain) is replaced by a new pattern, which works in ways never before conceived. This shift in the church, if it is to be successful, will result in the church understanding what the Kingdom of God has always signified: a new humanity.
I re-wore my 1950s red dress styled with Victory rolls, a vintage hair snood and wedge shoes. In hindsight, the shoes were not such a good idea. My feet were killing me by the time that we got home. But I did score on some very neat finds. My cousin found me long red gloves that match my dress. I also picked up two vintage military hats - a ladies airforce hat and an army hat. I have always wanted to do vintage military outfits, and now this is the perfect opportunity. I also picked up some vintage underwear - 3 half slips and 1 full slip and a 1940s style floral dress. I find it strange in that a year ago, there is no way that I would have found vintage slips, but this year there was an abundance. My dad also scored well - he got a full 1970s suit. It fits him perfectly and looks really great.
Now we're relaxed, refreshed, and ready to tackle the second half of the semester!
We were supposed to leave on vacation on Saturday. That may still happen if DH continues to recover. That is what DH and the urologist say. He is getting stronger each day but I just do not know how he will manage the airplane ride. We will see what he decides and how his recovery proceeds. If he could stand the travel itself then one might as well convaless in Puerto Rico at a seaside resort than here in Cold Cold NJ! Also, praise the Lord that his bathroom skills are pretty much normal today.
ALSO: You might like to see the Life Magazine photographs of Audrey pictured above in the context of the original Life Magazine article.
** Wherever you are, Sin City is a state of mind! **
14. Py And Hassaan feat. Hassaan Mackey
George Clooney and Julia Roberts previously played lovers in the Ocean’s Eleven remake franchise.
Play is still so underrated. Their family operated on a play/work ethic: work to play & play to work. Children thrive if given the opportunity to do real work. It's why kids love cubbies, and mini plastic lawn mowers, and kid-size brooms etc.
The Bedouin dress is what's known as "Tob'ob". Traditional Palestinian Bedouin dresses were often more than twice the length of the wearer and the sleeves were long, winged and large. They are decorated with red embroidery for married women and blue for younger unmarried women.
ok im 130 down but irregardless of this, i have a camera again. its a purple nikon s3300 and its lovely!
I swoon for him. And I swoon for Dave Barry too.
So I guess I, too, would love to share these moments with my little guy. It’s not so much that I long for him to one day be a chef (although I’d support him if he wanted to be one). It’s more about the time we spend together–laughing and getting to know each at a deeper level.
I think I’ve had too much to eat
Those are just a few of my thoughts on the subject. Feel free to post your own or offer examples of other bad headline wordplay in the comments below.
Hi, I’m Steph and I laugh too much. What you gonna do about it, though.*
Draw close, shine for the world to see
1. Drink plenty of water.
07.What goes Around
Need to tell the story: Birthing stories never made a lot of sense to me, until after I ran my first marathon; I wanted to tell people about the whole experience, the joy, the agony, and most long-distance runners I know are the same. For women who endure the mystery and trial of birth, it’s a massive accomplishment, unlike anything else in life; there’s a lot to tell! Those hours of trial are merely a blink of the eye in the passage of time, but the impact they leave on us is immense.
The other day a friend of mine said that a fair fight is a fight where there are set rules and both parties abide by those rules, only then is it a fair fight. Fighting against Africans cannot be a fair fight, because they do not abide by the rules, which is why whites cannot win against them, unless they adapt themselves appropriately, which seems unlikely at this stage.
Elyssa
Venky’s need to finally listen to the protests, take note of what the fans have to say, and start to act in the best interests of the club – not just their poultry business. Blackburn fans will not stand by and watch their club destroyed; they will fight to save it; and they will take drastic action if needs be. Venky’s be warned: Blackburn wants its Rovers back.
‘‘(3) CYBER THREAT INTELLIGENCE.—The term ‘cyber threat intelligence’ means information in the possession of an element of the intelligence community directly pertaining to a vulnerability of, or threat to, a system or network of a government or private entity, including information pertaining to the protection of a system or network from—
Update: Julia weighed in at 10 lbs at her appointment today (2-2-12). They want babies to be back up to their birth weight by two weeks. I think she's good!
Hoo boy. Here we go again.
After all…
* We don't temper anything to pour over this curry but if you want you can temper some mustard, dry red chillies and onions in coconut oil and pour over.
Stamps: Do Not Open –Christmas Penguins, Snowflake Solid lg, Snowflake Solid sm – Snow Globes & Snowflakes (Repeat Impressions)
I find myself at peace regardless of how life may be right now
One interesting intervention showed that asking participants to think about a compliment their partner gave them in an abstract manner (rather than just the details) implied the compliment was meaningful and resulted in increased self-esteem even in those with negative self-views (Marigold, Holmes, & Ross, 2007). In another study participants were given feedback that they had personality traits, both positive and negative, that fit with many partners and were thus in high demand (Murray et al., 2005). Again, participants with negative self-views responded with a boost in self-esteem. Together these findings suggest that changing reactions to positive feedback is possible, but requires subtly implying the value of an individual in a way that does not contradict self-views overtly.
Notice: No poultry of any sort were harmed during the writing of this story ... can't say the same for Lester DooLittle!
3 Stick Pins
Comment by Doug — 10 January, 2011 @ 11:38 am
Quick: did you keep your New Year’s Resolution in 2011? Can you even remember it?
6. The Information - Beck
Happy fashion week.
Martin Su
37. Ebon Gryphon – 50 gold
Pizza topping Good ole pepperoni
Pink cardigan - Primark
South America confirmed its standing on the list with 4 restaurants spanning Mexico, Peru and Brazil, whose São Paulo establishment D.O.M, run by ex-DJ Alex Atala, rose 3 places to enter the top 5 at no.4 and claim the Best Restaurant in South America title.
Yes. It will be the same product, from the same sources. Same high quality, same great taste. We've worked carefully with our suppliers, and they're ready to provide the increased amount of product that we'll need for the new store.
So, as awesome as Mulan is, she isn’t alone. Disney has a number of strong, independent, lovely, and intelligent women. Imagine all the gals (I’ve been made fun of so much for using that word since I’ve left Montana) in this blog teaming up. I wouldn’t want to get on their bad side. Nobody in their right mind would. Don’t try to get in the way of their happily ever after. Unless, that is one of the following fates sounds good to you:
A Note on Preparing your Weekly Meals
A little research lead me to a host of methods but most of them involved cooking the rice in half-and-half as the casserole baked, which can sometimes lead to uneven results. So instead I simply tossed together cooked rice with cooked onions, stirred in some sour cream, chipotle chiles, garlic and some spices, then I topped it with Gruyere cheese and threw it in the oven. After baking, it smelled wonderful but its monochromatic appearance was a bit bland so I livened it up with a splash of cilantro for green.
A lot of mistakes are made inside the gym, but there is also an overabundance of erroneous decisions outside the gym. Implementing a strong nutritional basis for your goals is key, allowing your body to perform to it’s optimum potential. The problem? Many people do not have the knowledge to build an effective yet healthy diet, ensuring that their goals are met and retained.
We slept reasonably soundly amid the howling gale and the bumping and rocking of the boat and, miraculously, Oscar didn’t need to go out for a wee in the middle of the night either.
2) Low-malt beer (happoshu):
2 oz. unsweetened chocolate (Or 6 T cocoa pwdr)
So I never showed you my first canvas. That's because it's a birthday gift for my sister. Whose birthday was in April. And I still haven't mailed it. Yeah. I'm kind of bad about that. Mailing stuff. (Hides head under a bag.) Sigh.
Like a veil.
jacket-vintage from Virgo
White is 255,255,255 (all colours in equal intensities).
What? You haven't heard this one?
Can it accomplish things other genres or forms can’t? I think I’d have to say yes but I’d argue that all works, regardless of length, should all do kind of the same thing – be that affect the reader, entertain them, make them laugh, move them or change them in some way. I think, because of its brevity, flash fiction when done well has a big echo, a long resonance. Flash fiction can be a single handclap in a cathedral rather than the full choir of a novel.
I was standing at the middle, slightly a lil bit corner, next to a statue thing full of chinese words where I have no idea what it is
1. Dairy Queen Butterfinger Blizzard
no legitimate law because we have no legitimate money.
- Hospitals could face rate freeze in Maryland (WaPo, 5/2) “For the past two years, the commissioners have increased hospital rates by less than the inflation rate hospitals faced.”
The Beverly Hillbillies
The last two journaling cards on the right side of my 2 page spread. I used more patterned paper, some tickets from My Mind's Eye, misted chipboard stars and some small letter stickers.
Please visit my yt, i have some art videos on and will be making more. If you have yt, add me and i will always add back and leave positive comments on your videos.
Here’s what gives, in character creation.
Big Brother, er, I mean Barnes & Noble has this to say: “We know how challenging it can be for parents to make smart choices for their kids,” said William Lynch, president of Barnes & Noble.com. “Adding Common Sense Media ratings and reviews for books, movies, games, and music is our way of making life easier for parents and taking the worry out of making age-appropriate selections for their kids.”
May this year gives him better strength to overcome his biggest trauma, and continue to provide quality songs as himself and part of BigBang and lastly stay cheerful and free spirited as always.
The A.B.O. Slate
Once again, eBay pulled my auction. I understand why they pulled it the first time. They just don't want unethical people saying the auction is for charity and then pocketing the money. I understand that. When I went to relist it, Make a Wish Foundation didn't come up on their alphabetized list or under the categories of charities helping children. Because it didn't appear to be part of eBay's Giving Works, I listed it again and didn't write in my auction that I was going to donate the money, yet I still tried to make it clear to potential bidders that I really was going to donate the funds.
Oh, it's still as hot as ever in Mumbai but the sea got a whole lot rougher and huge puffs of thunderous-looking dark clouds have been teasing our skies. The countdown has started, though. The day the monsoons reach the Malabar coast of Kerala, the people of Mumbai start counting off the 10 days they have before the Great Monsoon Spectacle lavishes Mumbai with some much-needed rainy affection
For the first time in two years and five months he was going to spend the evening somewhere else besides Karolinska Hospital. His anger at Anna’s betrayal would not let him go, and by God he would show her. She could lie there all alone and wonder where he was. Tomorrow he would tell her that he had been at the pub having a good time. Then she’d regret it, realise that she could actually lose him.
Oh, I will share the secret word with you in just one moment...
Source: Digital radio broadcast
- Sulfates
Of course, these changes meant moving furniture off of rugs and rearranging the furniture in new ways.
The inevitable resistance by the working-class native population — along with parts of the literate middle class — prompted repeated attempts on the part of Western governments, the EU, and the UN to suppress what is variously known as “racism”, “xenophobia”, and “Islamophobia”.
Also on Monday, a Federal judge in Texas blocked implementation of a recently signed rule that targeted funding for Planned Parenthood. The Texas Health and Human Services Commissioner implemented the rule which said that the Texas Women’s Health Program (which uses Federal Medicaid money), would not fund services at Planned Parenthood or any other “affiliates of abortion providers.” So, even though the services being funded are NOT abortions and are critical health services for low-income women (over 130,000 in Texas!), the Texas government wants to block service to punish one provider. Lovely. U.S. District Court Judge Lee Yeakel was just as clear and succinct as his colleagues in Oklahoma:
Mostly, I've been instrospective. I've been processing all that this summer was to us. Although you might not know it from reading this blog, a lot more took place in me and in our family than just cool sight-seeing and outings. So much changed in us this summer, in who we are, in what God did in us, and in how we want to be and look at life differently. I posted mostly about the outings, the fun stuff, the vacation-y parts of our life because it's easier to post about that stuff. At least it is for me. It's not as easy to post about the growing and stretching that's slowly occurring in me. It's not as easy to talk about the serious stuff, the changes that have occurred in me and the deeper things I am growing through.
Ray Harryhausen's special effects were beyond special in the film. While they certainly look dated now, they had such a nice, tangible quality about them. Just seeing the detail in his creatures was awe inspiring then and brings back waves of nostalgia now.
Back to the puppet! I had a Mrs Oakley the farmer's wife puppet in stock so we set to to transform her into the Queen. Off came the mop cap she was wearing and I made her a crown with grey hair attached while Jo made her sparkly cape. What a fun hour we had.
They began tentatively, progressing from small pats and sniffs to Gully waiting by the door, tail twitching when Ed came home. He still trembled at the sight of long, thin objects – from garden rakes to wooden spoons – but grew bolder, until the night Ed found the dog’s head resting on his knee. It felt like nothing had ever belonged to him more.
Prior to that I had been involved in business development in various firms including recruitment and publishing. As a child I was always looking for ways to make extra money whether that be taking on extra paper rounds, cleaning (cars, windows, and houses but to my mothers dismay, never my own bedroom). I even had a lunchtime sandwich round on an industrial estate whilst I was waiting for my apprenticeship start date. If I had an idea I would just do it and I suppose whilst this was sometimes a little risky, it forms my overall attitude when confronted with an opportunity and it has put me in good stead in adult life.
He turned to me, the heavy gold cross he wore on a gold chain around his neck flashed in the artificial light of the room. I smiled back at him. ‘Wait,’ I said.
“Big deal,” sniffs local merchant Ezra Cohen. “My friend Apollonius of Tyana can do that, too.”
As you can probably guess, ubiquity has bred contempt*.The shaker glass is ugly, we're told, it's too thick, it 'cheats' the consumer because it's not really a pint, and beer just doesn't taste as good in it. Besides, the Belgians have different glasses for every beer, and the English have 20 oz. pints, and the Germans have...small glasses for kölsch!
Because right now, today, I'll tell you that if we never get to add to our little family, I'll be fine. Disappointed of course, but I'll survive. I adore being a mother, and I would love nothing more than to add to this amazing little family that we have going, but I also feel more strongly than ever that God knows just what He's doing. And I have peace in knowing that infertile or not, if He wants our family to grow, then it will. And if He doesn't, then it won't-and He'll supply all the grace I need to move on.
guttural fuck from
Merry Christmas!
My neighbor came by a few days ago to introduce herself, and I in return said, WILL YOU PLEASE COME BE OUR BIRTHDAY PARTY? She brought her kids (3) and gift and an extension cord so we could try to put some dents in our wall by playing with a PINATA.. Another Jaxon "must-have" item.
When they are completely cool, if you can wait that long, they can be eaten or stored in a cool place. They will keep for a couple weeks in the refrigerator. I don't recommend storing them outside the fridge since they have cream cheese in them. I have left them out for a couple
Executive Director, the Japan Society for Global System and Ethics
After talking to a couple of my friends here, it became clear that the word doesn’t exist because the concept doesn’t either. At least not to the extent it does for us. I played out a couple scenarios that can only be described as awkward: What if you’re on a date and you run into your ex? What if you spend a long time telling a joke and no one laughs?
The most endearing was the "SEC" that was just visible underneath his cardigan. Crisp, white dress shirt. Creased black dress pants. This one was a security guard, I realized, my heart growing warm. A male security guard, secure enough in himself to pen a piece of prose or rhyme while swaying to the subway chimes on a Friday evening.
The changes in New Jersey are most evident on defense. No big names like Niedermayer, Rafalski or Stevens. Instead they rely on a journeyman crew of Andy Greene, Marek Zidlicky, Anton Volchenkov and youngster Adam Larsson. If the Panthers are to have a chance, they will have to exploit this group.
7. Mr. Cool himself.
I put the cover on last night. I went for simple on the cover. I had three panels of marbleized silk and I wanted to showcase them. Here is the front:
The Scriptures give us images of infection--
5) “You’re working too hard at your job.” or “This fertility stuff is your only focus! You need a distraction.”
‘Preach on, preach on!’
Under the new proposal, Japan will accept responsibility for $3.1 billion of the $8.6 billion cost for relocation. The plan fits nicely with an agreement concluded with Australia authorizing the rotation of 2,500 Marines through Darwin. The first contingent of Marines have already deployed to Australia.
But because the man was looking at bushes, not hearts; bricks, not lives; seas and not souls, he decided that God had done nothing.
So, do we really need to worry about a huge solar storm burning out the electrical systems of half the world in 2013? Masochists that we are here at the Telegraph, we love to shoot down our own stories, and I was cracking my knuckles for this one. It’s got all the ingredients – white-coated authority, grave warnings of impending doom, exciting sciencey nuclear nemesis in space. NASA! Solar flares! Planes falling out of the sky! Etc.
The A Side:
I never saw this trick/tip so I don't know if anyone else does this or if I'm just soooo original.
"It is clear that the ANC is trapped in the past and that they do not understand the sensitivities of South
6. This morning I sat down with my laptop to complete a 15 minute test for early signs of dementia....and forgot why I'd opened the laptop. Absolutely true, I swear!
Honestly, I’d have lost my mind a long time ago if I didn’t have my writing. I have always balanced writing while aspiring in other areas. Such as, I am getting my PhD in Psychology currently as as a law degree. I am a wedding planner and have a full resume of other accomplishments but without writing, I’m not me.
gundik gundik ku - my single gorgeous sexy friends... 5 gorgeous ladies needed. 3 confirmed another 2 will be confirmed later.
But what I want to know is this. Why do supermarkets have to put stickers on them? It is disgusting. You have to peel them off and then literally scrub the gluey goo off the pear while you’re washing it. Today the skin of the pear was so gooey and gluey that I actually had to cut a bit of the pear off. I know! Shocking, isn’t it. I mean I don’t go spending my hard earned money on a pear so I can cut some of it off and throw it out, do I? And all because shops can scan the bloody thing because it’s more efficient. I mean can they not just have a button with a picture of a pear or can they not just get a machine that recognises the actual product and scans it thus – now there’s an idea for someone to have a crack at.
#2 singles Conner Sexton defeated D. Pratt (6-1) (6-1)
Never mind that she doesn’t have any bottoms on. We were doing great for her to have a shirt on in the second pic. I don’t know what the fascination is with some kids stripping the dolls down and leaving them that way. Guess who has not recieved a request for doll clothes? That would be me. Am I complaining? That’s a “no”.
Parallel cards (of course)
The court case against Peter is rather compelling and fascinating, as put up by Nicholas Greco, the PI hired by Peter’s first wife’s mother. Greco uncovers information that raises all fingers to Peter’s guilt but certain bits of information soon turn the case in a different direction altogether.
Lately there have just been a bit more than normal. Popps isn't settling at school, teacher has asked to see me twice, there are have been melt downs about not wanting to go and her behaviour has at times been nothing like we have seen before. Managing this is taking up my head space.
While the house slowly filled with the smell of freshly baked bread we added some stems to the felt rosebuds. We already had silver painted branches from a never finished xmas project and found a couple more plain ones in the yard. I simple cut a small hole in the bottom felt layer of the bud and poked the branch into the bud from the bottom. I removed it again, filled it with hot glue and attached the stem again. I like them in the empty coffee can and don't know if the kids really will give them out for valentines. They found a good spot in my kitchen.
Fundamentally I do have a problem with bachelor/bachelorette parties, although it took me ages to be able to go against society and actually vocalize that. I think it’s ridiculous. “Last fling before the ring”? You are in a relationship that has most likely lasted years! Get real, you are going out to (if you are a dude) look at some women and their breasts and hope that some girl hits on you so that you can feel like a real man in front of your friends who put this idea in your head that your wedding and marriage to the woman you love will someone kill and destroy the person you truly are. If you are a woman you are operating under society’s idea that your man will never let you have fun again, so you go out to have as much fun as possible in one night.
Tell 7 facts about yourself.....
* Before getting an agent and achieving publication did you have to deal with rejection along the way? Could you tell us about your journey to publication?
As a result? My emotions have been all over the place… I’ve cried on and off for the last several days. I feel stress, pressure to perform, loneliness… I think it would be easy for depression to rear it’s ugly head. Sunday was particularly bad. I just wanted to coil myself inside of myself and dwell deep inside me. I feel like there are so many things stirring around in me that I don’t feel like I can verbalize. I’d love to… but right now I don’t feel like I can. I am afraid. I’m not feeling trust… feeling that I can freely speak my emotions… here or anywhere right now. I hate feeling that way. It makes me so sad. I have to release my feelings…. it’s who I am.
Also this week I hosted 20 people for a book discussion of a novel I had grown to hate after reading it through twice! That almost never happens to me and I was a wreck over what to say and how to handle it. My stomach was in knots for days. On top of that I was going to be "observed" by one of our new staffers who'll also be planning book discussions next year. This maudlin, annoying novel? Please Look After Mom by the prolific Korean writer Kyung-Sook Shin.
Potential open data projects range from creating art to basing academic schedules around transit times, said Lougheed.
Thank you Jessie for this inspiration.
Menu: VolumeManager/Disk/Encapsulate
Finally take a pure black colour *gasp* yes pure black but remember the little baby we call the blending brush will make it all less scary. Think of your shader/blender as your security, any colour which is over dense can be softened. Just take the plunge and with a small brush add the black to the outer corner and outer half of the socket line. Blend Blend Blend.
I have to say that I'm pretty happy with this little diversion. True, it doesn't look like much. My pictures, when I bother with them at all, mostly suck, I use the boring standard blogger template, and it's painfully obvious that I neither invest nor make any money on the blog. I'm not on the industry's list of bloggers to reach out to with important press releases (or free samples), and my blog has never been nominated for or received any sort of award.
The darkness of the sky goes on
Pop music seems vapid. Pornographic. Angry. Violent.
On platform level there are about 8-10 seats before the barriers and two vending machines. There were a number of people already on the platform and a few empty seats along the sides. The cross on the diagram is where I sat to observe. I was aware that the girl sitting to my right might catch on to the fact that I was observing if I kept looking round back toward the barrier and then writing in my notebook so instead I focused on the two groups of people in front of me. There was a group of 3 girls and 2 older women, probably the girls mothers. The all had handbags but no other luggage and were waiting on the same Glasgow train as me. I thought that it was highly likely that they were going on a day long shopping trip. They bought coffee and hot chocolate from the little coffee shop and stood around in a circle drinking it. There were not enough seats for them to sit down all together and although there were 5 free seats, four of them were next to people already sitting down (myself included). When more people came through the barrier they also did not sit down. Some proceeded straight to the platform and a few stood looking at the departures board. There seemed to be a kind of rule that you cannot really sit next to another person that you don't know, this is something that I have noticed before and the seats are usually only full when the station is really busy. It would be better if there were more seats on platform level, but the problem would be finding the space to put them in. When the group of ladies had finished their hot drinks there were no bins for them to put their cups in, not even the clear plastic bags on a hoop that you sometimes see at rail stations not, so that the contents are clearly visible. There are usually no bins because of the threat of terrorist attack. This is a problem for passengers especially if they have a lot of luggage to carry as well, they do not want to hold on to an empty cup. It would be better if there was a bin specially designed for rail stations that meant that people could dump their ribbish and could also rule out the possibility that dangerous items could also be dumped.
For some reason, once I switched over to regular crochet, I combined a couple of patterns and then made up a fair amount of stuff as I went along. It was ok, though, because I wrote myself little notes on a slip of paper so that I would be able to replicate it when I did the front of the jumper. I failed to take into account that I have three small children who are intensely fascinated by my crochet stuff. That combined with their compulsion to liberally distribute my books and other belongings all over the living room resulted in a lost slip of paper with helpful notes on it.
Instead of a dainty triangle of baklava, Poseidon's portion is like a rock. The top is a thick, multi-layered roof of homemade flakey phyllo dough; the middle is a meaty blend of crushed walnuts and almonds; and the bottom is saturated with honey—the kind that, instead of being overwhelming or cloying, adds just the right touch of sweetness.
Thanks again Mari and the Creative Card Crew Team!
I also decided to sprinkle the blackberry ones with some crushed sugar cubes, just for a change, before baking. I bought these in France and have never seen them for sale in the UK ~ not in my part of the UK anyway.
Every person’s responsibility is to nurture love and bring it into this world.
Support the grass roots organizations who work on the ground. The ones who see this stuff daily and ARE His hands and feet.
CONTRAST CLAUSE: This is not the same as the DrZap version uploaded previously, which has fallen off the tracker. This recording is from a different taper in a different location.
Rice flour ------ 1 cup
What that opinion says to me, is that some children have the right to choose, the right to live in a way that nurtures freedom, and some? Some don't. I believe that freedom, on both an individual and community level, is a fundamental right for every person and community. So deciding that some children deserve to be given as much freedom as possible, yet some don't, just really doesn't sit right with me.
Although the weather drizzled a little
I'd love to see one, by the way, if anyone would like to share.
By 10 p.m. that night, we felt our bodies rise and fall steadily as Carl navigated the “hills”. We wearily dragged our bodies into the apartment we were staying at for the next few nights, appreciated it’s simplistic warmth, and crashed hard.
WU: Whate are some of your favorite online shopping and resource sites for brides?
boat ride
What I think is useful about this dichotomy is that I think we can use it to evaluate our way of being in the world. Is this action or that, this choice or that, this lifestyle or that, promoting health, growth, and strengthening or is it promoting disease, decay, and weakening? What I like about the growth/decay metaphor is that growth is not easy, it takes work and energy and it often involves pain. Decay, on the other hand, is very easy, simply stop working. Decay is slow and persistent, and it requires nothing from you except a lack of attention. Decay is a word that connotes a kind of numbness on our way out of being. According to Hindu scripture the end of the world comes ‘not with a bang but a whimper’ when Krishna withdraws his hot-blooded force from the universe. To put it another way, in the words of Stephen King, “Get busy living, or get busy dying.”
Docs mentioned that it should have been amputated. I opted not to do that – why? because what happens when they get in there and realize she’s got no chest cavity to cover up the space where the leg was? What happens when she requires multiple; (meaning many many many many many) surgeries to repair whatever is or isn’t there? I have trouble enough putting some of these animals under 2 or 3 times — let alone 5 or 6. Plus, it doesn’t hurt her.
“Eat? Well last night we all had sandwiches, don’t you know, with a lovely ham and a nice wedge of Limburger cheese…”
Whoever offers me the sacrifice of thanksgiving honors me; *
I have to confess to something today... Where to stay, is the big question I try and avoid...
Many Indian dishes bear their origins to Mughals. The dish we know as 'meethe chaawal' is one such. Meethe chaawal is known as 'zarda' in Pakistan and gets its name due to the yellow colour of the dish, from the Persian word 'zarda' which means yellow. It is served on special occasions and is made traditionally using clarified butter or ghee. I am not in favour of artificial or store bought food colourings and hence use only saffron (kesar or zafran), but these days meethe chaawal comes in a sprinkling of colours, so if you would like to go ahead, then colour it wild. (as wild as green, yellow or orange can get!). This is a popular dessert in the Indian regions of Punjab, Sindh and Rajasthan.
and turned your maiden voyage into rape
Back it: Monaghan +1 is 5/4 with Paddy Power. This looks tempting especially if Monaghan were to score. Sligo have been relying on a lot of late goals recently, I think they prime for a Roddy scalp.
The collective’s adaptation to the presence of a potential
Sometimes, you walk past a payphone booth, but the phone itself has been removed. The structure left as a reminder, ruins of a past civilization. People walk past the payphones with their children, as if they’re walking past a piece of history, long-since forgotten.
Briefly, The Millipede Engine is a kind of heavy industrial tunnelling machine, like a gigantic metal worm, with a dual head part that controls the whole thing. The body is comprised of many different replaceable motor segments, which means the thing never breaks down and it can just keep on trundling along while faulty sections are replaced on the fly. It seemed somehow fitting for us with our nucleus of Honey and I and various other contributors that come and go along the journey... plus I like the underground connotations.
Spirit to matter till death come.
The form isn't the problem here. It's the entire novel.
A Christian travelling to Saudi Arabia cannot take a bible or a cross into that country, nor could he display pictures or caricatures of the Prophet Mohammed. I have no particular problem with this — when in Rome etc. — but I do have a problem, to put it mildly, when my own government appears intent on importing the political ideology of sharia into my own country.
Here is my newest project. I picked this up at coffee break designs warehouse sale and I am going to turn it into a book. When I bought it I had no clue what I was going to do with it, but then I laid awake thinking about it last night (instead of sleeping) and came up with a plan. I'm hoping to start on it sometime the day after tomorrow. Summer semester starts for me tomorrow, so I am back teaching classes. I'm looking forward to it, but it always cuts out some of my time.
OK, I don't know about you all but I really don't like teaching science. I think it's because I don't feel like I have many resources or help when it comes to science. As a resource room teacher, it is kind of hard to do the same activities the regular classrooms do. So many of those things are based on Kagan strategies or group work, and my kids just struggle with that.
225g caster sugar
I am of course hoping for another camp like last year and that God will move among us once more this week!!
Viz Media’s Senior VP and General Manger Alvin Lu said in the App Press Release:
Then came the best part for my inner magpie; the blingification. I already had a tiara, but more hair accessories were added. Then came a whopper neck piece, an upper-arm adornment (not flattering for those of us with bingo wings),
Then Kari and Julia went home, and Kim and I went to the older boy's practice. We watched CPT and Hunter and Tom. It was a good time. We stayed for the uniforms to be passed out and got their schedules. And yeah, it was 9pm by the time we left the field. Holy crap!
Anyway, as you can see no Catrice today :O I made a few swatches the other day and only had one left to post today. I kept thinking; Which one is this? And then I realized it was Pool Party At Night... xD
Boil the potatoes for 10 minutes. Drain. Then crush them up a bit with a fork, glug some olive oil and salt onto them, and roast for 30 minutes in hot oven.
The treasure of the Naam, the Name of the Lord, is Ambrosial Nectar; meet together and drink it in, O Siblings of Destiny. (Guru Granth Sahib, Ang 318)
I have to steel myself to go on. I will not molder for the rest of my life. If I’m going to be here on Earth, I want to live, laugh, love. But not yet. I’m not ready to let go of my grief. It’s all I have left of him.
Amount of whining involved in any trip with me as a child: too much
We launched a new report today on the top ten ways in which councils are boosting – and bashing – micro-enterprises in their area. Whilst some areas limit ways of spending personal budgets or access to ‘approved provider’ lists to tried and tested large providers, others actively encourage creativity and have thought through the environment needed for successful start-ups. Some councils throw a bit of money at budding micro-entrepreneurs in the hope that some great ideas will stick, whilst others have used the learning from successful micro-enterprise programmes (eg 125 jobs and 40 volunteering opportunities created in three years by Oldham’s Community Catalysts programme) to create a really thoughtful support programme which gives entrepreneurs a fighting chance of success.
I can't focus properly on either of them, so I keep this going for the next five minutes or so. Blade, phone, blade, phone. The repetition has a calming effect on me and I nearly walk away from them both. I know that's not the answer, though. The sensible thing to do is to phone Rachel and talk. But I’ve tried that twice already, and each time, I’m not brave enough to ask her the question I need to.
1/4 cup packed fresh mint leaves
What stood out to me the most was that our last speaker said that the center does research, but they do not do clinical trials, only post-market research. I have always ruled out clinical research because I ethically can’t do research on a new drug that could cause further harm, but I had never thought of post-market research. I guess I can keep an open-mind towards this area though I don’t think post-market research is my calling, but you never know. It’s pretty interesting. I’m sure this summer will help narrow my research interests…(In case you didn’t know, I will be in Rochester, Minnesota this summer, working with a cardiovascular epidemiologist with the Mayo clinic. I’m so excited!)
Well, the programme in question kicked off again… but… placed at the bottom left of the screen occupying (at a rough guess) approximately ten percent of the physical screen-space… was a run-on of one of the previous advertisements.
* Detergent + stain remover + brightener in one
There aren’t many guests I want to see yet but the full list has not been announced yet, which reminds me I need to get my weekend ticket XD
You would think that would make menu planning easier but we are also having quite an unexpected heatwave which means sometimes what sounds like a good plan on Sunday is less so when Thursday rolls around and is sweltering.
We'd also forgotten "The Professor"'s TV work, including a North Coast Cable-based show "Sports 101" that was apparently seen nationally in the 1990s. (North Coast Cable was the original Cleveland-based cable system, which is today's Cleveland arm of Time Warner Cable, passing through Cablevision and Adelphia along the way.)
no ceiling
This was a poor setup. Someone was directing traffic every 6 feet in those parking lots, but when it came to trying to enter the arena there was one person at each of the six gates letting people through the doors. If this was not bad enough, they did not let us in until a half an hour before the show. It had already been raining on us for ten minutes before that. A half an hour before show does not give you a lot of time to go buy things, run to the bathroom, or even really find your seats. We missed out on buying a Ziggler shirt for this reason. (That’s my story and I’m sticking to it)
Of course, I am sure it angers the little wrens and sparrows that have always hung out at fast food restaurants. They were there first, after all. And they aren’t scavengers like the big black crows.
The pike let him come right next to it. The thick hoor thought it was camouflaged against the maroon carpet. He dropped the net slowly behind its tail. Then, he drew it forward along its body. It must have been an eight or nine pound fish.
The design team assignment for this month was to create 3 cards, with one of the cards being "masculine." When making this card I kept my husband in mind and created something that I would give to him. The rich, rustic colors of the Basic Grey "Pyrus" line coupled with embellishments from Authentique's "Gathering" collection made this very easy. Along with the DT assignment I also tried to create cards that could be made using scraps to encourage myself (and maybe others!) to finally use all of those little pieces of paper I cling so dearly to.
I mean do I honestly think that the Warrior Dash is gonna be easy. Dude no. No. I needed to “scared-straight” myself because missing three days can become a week, then two. So I visited the website again and studied the 13 obstacles that await me. I’m doing some push-ups tonight. Maybe even the Doctor Oz Seven Minute Workout. Something.
The ruling remains quizzical since Gulen received scant formal education.
Almost through this week, P&Q Rangers. It’s been a week fraught with peril, death-defying stunts, and encounters with extraterrestrials. Well, maybe not that interesting, but marginally moreso than a routine week at work. I’ll let it fly.
DH ran into emergency hollering for help, people came flying from everywhere, he ran back out to the van and lifted me out by himself (I am not exactly a light weight) and put me in the wheelchair and they whisked me off, cut off my clothes, and put any airway down my throat with great difficulty. Once they got me stabilized off I went by ambulance to Calgary where I spent 2 weeks in the Foothills Hospital. 8 of those days were on life support in ICU. I was one happy puppy when all the tubes could be removed. Turns out that when I fell and my head snapped back it caused a bleed which over time formed a huge mass behind my airway and eventually pressed on it till it was closed off. One of those really weird things that you would have no way of knowing until you can't breath. I don't remember arriving at the hospital, in fact I don't remember anything until later the next day. God was so good and He was with me every step of the way. I had no fear, never panicked when I couldn't breathe and I know that was all by the grace of God.
The second reason that I remember the book so well is because it was the first time I had ever encountered sex in the written form. And I liked it. I liked it a lot. In fact, I remember dog-earing the first time when they bone because it was sexual in great detail, including Milfy Blonde taking her clothes off and desperately pulling at Coach's zipper until she got his cock out and started sucking it.
Noticing that everyone was finished their meal, Jim announced that the breakfast joke time had arrived. Jim prefaced the joke by saying that he could hear the late Jimmy Mullen tell this joke:
Dr. Lawson is pulling rank and is pretty much ignoring the groups opinions. Chase they should treat her just like any other patient’s mother and scope out her house. Chase and Adams find some experimental drugs in her basement and assume that she’s testing the drugs on Emily, which she has been. Those drugs also cause renal failure in mice and rats. Oops, mama.
Finally, if you’re in the vicinity of 25th Avenue, just north of Van Buren (behind the Pep Boys building there, just across the street from Werner’s Welding), you owe it to yourself to stop in to Old World Brewery. You won’t see a sign on the front of the building so you’ll just have to trust your instincts, friends.
Tra tutte le partecipanti al Challenge ne verrá estratta una con il sistema Random che riceverá in regalo questa fantastica collezione di carte Scribble Scrabble "Jubilee" .
Bees, bees, bees. Who would think that bees would have a place at a State Fair? Honey is a big deal in Indiana and visiting the Ag/Hort Building (Agriculture/Horticulture) means checking out honey vendors! My kids love the honey lady at our Farmer's Market each week and I love this annual visit to the honey vendors at the Fair! Last year, one of the honey producers introduced a new product- jalapeno whipped honey. The day I heard about it, I didn't have the money to buy any but planned to go back for it. Went back a couple of days later and it was sold out. This year, I bought 2 large jars of it on the second day of the Fair and when I went back yesterday, the large jars had sold out!
The journey came to a crossroads when I sat down at a bar table with an undercover officer. I started talking to him and he asked what I was doing there. “What do you mean?” was my response.
Hence, before Women’s History Month is completely gone, I take a moment to salute this pioneering journalist. Learn, gentle readers, from the woes of editors whose pants were stolen by a woman and the judge who feared the editor who did not fear jail and the senator who broke faith.
Quiet day at home.
Anyway, bless you bitter expensive Starbucks, because three espresso shots and a few headlines later, I am for the nonce as right as rain.
Of course, it won’t be long until Gabby’s daughter, Pinkie, figures out were that sunny spot is. Blind as she is, she’ll find it, and she’ll enjoy lying there just as much as Gabby used to. Now she’ll have the spot all to herself.
“I can’t make comparisons of our team to anybody else,” Saban said. “I haven’t seen all these people play. I’ve seen LSU play a couple of times because they are in our league, and I think they have a fantastic team. … I haven’t even seen Oklahoma play so I can’t make any comparisons to what our team is.”
By this point in the show, I was hooked, but more than that, I was (and remain) terrified. Because this is my life. Or at least, this is the life that I see every one of my friends living post-graduation.
and sank in tumult to a lifeless ocean.
The first time I heard Tools You Can Trust was on their first Peel session in 1983 and the song that blew me away was Working and Shopping, so different from owt else that was around then. There's not much on the web about them but I've found a bit just click on the name to see what they released. I will upload the peel sessions as I know I have 2 & 3somewhere, if anyone has 1 please pass it on as it has me fav track on it. Until then here's a later release that combines the first 3 singles hope you like it as much as I do, ps funny to see the Cresents again !!?
The fleet reached Table Bay on 5 June 1615 – a good voyage, since they “only buried three or four men”. There were, however, some thirty “sick and lazy”. A meeting of ship’s captains was held to decide whether to land the convicts. There was disagreement so eventually Captain Keeling of the Dragon, into whose custody the convicts had been given, agreed to only land ten of them.
CONSCIENCE: You should probably step away from the keyboard.
Anyone have a talent in Graphic Design and want to trade services? I want to get a few things done…maybe some labels, new header for my blog, or a watermark. I am willing to trade services if there is anything you would like made in return :)
“Even to your old age and gray hairs
On the other hand, nobody had compliments for the graphics or the character models. The latter still are in a bad spot in the uncanny valley while the former aren’t bad, but you have to tinker with your settings (and does any game have more settings options than EQ2?) to make things look good.
On the journey to healing you must create and instill your own new, healthy beliefs. Here are some examples to inspire you, and get you started.
Through scholarly research, the interaction of Western Esotericism with the mystical traditions of organized religion has been recognized to be extensive. Further, and less well known, is the often pivotal role esoteric groups and beliefs have had in shaping the modern world as a whole, while remaining “Hidden in Plain Sight.”
Well, let me help…
How many of us have had khaman or dhoklas from the local marwadi snack shop or a high end snack bar…almost all of us…it is light, yummy and fills the stomach is’nt it?? Well this delightful snack has its origins in Gujarat and it is called “Khaman”…it is also called as “Dhoklas” in many other places..in the shops they are made of besan or gram flour…here i have made them in the traditional gujarati home style..i.e made of channa dal…
83And bids them make mistaken mortals groan,
- Perfume Samples of Prada, Black XS, Nina Ricci: Nina L'Elixir and L'Air, Lady Million, and Prada Candy
A: Yes, but you'll have to learn it first
I tried to maximize it so the hills looked more intense but no such luck. I'm not sure how accurate my Garmin is with elevation on trails (or ever, to be honest). I think for this run it was pretty accurate but sometimes on a trail run the elevation gain will be 50 feet, or 3,000 feet on a easy neighborhood run. What's up with that?
The greater appeal, though, will be for fans of the character or the genre, and those who remember the story’s radio broadcast, all of whom will I imagine be delighted that these recordings exist at all. Those with only a passing interest in the material should probably listen out for an episode on Radio 4 Extra before buying.
Nothing like a couple free stencils, an extra glass ornament, and some Martha Stewart glitter to
He listed what was required of us in breathtaking language:
Regardless of historical contention, there is a real sense that this path has seen many wayfarers over hundreds, even thousands of years, and continues to do so: following the southern slope of the chalk hills, parts of it are now integrated into the North Downs Way National Trail.
Here in Sitges, the honeycomb matrices of niches made a really interesting sight, with ladders littered all over the place, and decorated with very bright (but mostly artificial) flowers. A peaceful place to come and connect with those who have passed on.
With no clouds in the sky on Saturday morning, my chances of making something out of the sunrise were slim. I decided to make a short trip up the hill to the outskirts of my laid-back little town of Fairfax, California.
Blacks (80-90)
Copyright: Law firms Sued for Submitting Prior Art to the USPTO
Mostly….the purple ribbon represent an awareness of domestic violence.
Your Fearless Leader
Girl moves into a tiny condo instead of a house.
Ain't dat da trut?
BF: In any case, what happened was that there was a group within the Pentagon and the agencies and stuff that realized this plan was insane.
Concurrently, I contacted someone from admissions, someone from the alumni or development office and other professors working in other labs on campus.
I was gonna write a real “sturring” response on the effects of this fountain of youth but I think ya’ll would have a good time doing a little research on your own. There is quite a bit on this part of Texas even though there ain’t much to the place itself. It is all in one’s mind and you will see what I am talking about….maybe. I will post a couple of clicking links ( go ahead and “Google “ – Hondo Crouch )and If I can figure out how to get ‘em in the right places, I will post some pics.
Whether you live in a traditional family or a more radical one, it is difficult to put your own needs behind the needs of your child all of the time without becoming a disconnected, embittered martyr. If you have decided to unschool, however, it is not only difficult to do - it makes unschooling significantly more challenging and less rewarding.
a bead of condensation that is forming on the can
aluminium bottles.
I hope she doesn't see this; I don't think she checks my blog (I hope). If she does: Hey Mom you just ruined your card. Surprise!
And I still check the wardrobe in every room I stay in.
Hupp hasn’t been following the story too closely, but she catches snippets of news here and there, she said. Her opinion is that the animals should be left at the zoo where they’ll be professionally cared for.
A CIVIL ACTION
Between Christina's birth and death, exists a timeline of trends that could foreshadow disaster. After September 11th, the fundamental rifts between American political parties deepened and quickly grew toxic, platforms for incendiary rhetoric became commonplace as media grew less objective and more partisan, wars were started abroad to supposedly protect the homeland, while morally and financially draining it, the rich grew richer and the middle class became poor and the backlash toward foreigners in a country of immigrants, showed a very hateful, xenophobic side of Americans, particularly in Arizona.
that refused
Now we might specify that defeat of a bill in the second chamber never constitutes a loss of confidence in the government, so that it does not trigger resignation or dissolution. But then, we need a mechanism other than an election for getting over the conflict between the two chambers, at least for those bills that need to be passed, such as budgets. How this is to be done is not obvious (though not impossible), but whatever mechanism is, its existence dilutes the power of the second chamber to reject the government’s proposals and thus diminishes the benefits Waldron hopes for it.
We hope you can join us in our challenge this week and we look forward to seeing all your cuties ! The DT have made some marvellous cards for your inspiration again this week.
Will die in the smoke,
Five Tumblr Pictures For Tonight
If curious, please follow the link and you will be able to see the moment we met. I’m sorry if your suffering from some kind of allergy after watching this bit.
“The arrested men are radical Islamists who have been fighting in Afghanistan and Pakistan against NATO and they will be charged with terrorism,” Police Minister, Gordana Jankulovska said.
We need oil – let’s take that for granted. But what we do with oil should not be taken for granted.
except
I remember the first time I went on a drop ride. I was 14 I think. I was visiting my mom in California and we went to a local amusement park and went on one. I was hooked!! Loved the free-fall feeling and the swirl in my belly! Such a rush!!!!
The presenter, however, makes another point that is rather less believable, namely that the story of ancient Athens vs. ancient Atlantis was a parable for the recent and ongoing -in Plato's time- conflict between the Greeks and the Persians. He argues that the despotism of the kings of Atlantis parallels that of the King of Persia, while the democratic institutions of 4th c. BC Athens parallel those of old Athens.
like stale words fed by machine
Now its time to assemble your enchiladas!
May Allah help you and i to recieve justice that Islam gives us. Allah is my witness.
Dr. Grant showed me tons of before and after pictures of tummy tucks he’s performed, and walked me through what the operation would entail. If you’re squeamish, I suggest you skip the next paragraph.
JW wants to impress upon us that NO ONE is listening/reading us…well wouldn’t she be surprised to really know just how much of a following we REALLY do have and how many people GIVE us the kidos to continue on with exposing Joan Wheeler. The real reason that JW has to resort to imaginary friends is because she has no real ones! I still fail to see how ‘Champ/Joan’ seems to feel that she has given some sort of ‘point of reference’ to confirm they are NOT Joan. Blog addresses/references on a stat page of any blog does not CONFIRM any one’s existence, it only show some point of entry, NOT existence of being a human being!
Imagine then a world like that of the Jetsons where the surface was unseen and not thought about (except by scientists and industrialists). Floating forests and croplands could be assembled to mimic earth habitats and provide resources for a bourgeoning population of Venusian humans. Skyships would cruise between the flying city states dotted jewel-like in the glowing heavens. Over time these flying habitats could be used to alter the planetary temperature and shield the desolate lands below. Humankind and whatever friends and stowaways came with us would finally have a second home in easy shouting distance of Earth. How long would it be then before we took steps to take Earth life even farther into the universe?
We’ve all experienced this some time or the other. Whenever we did anything under stress or pressure or half-heartedly, the results also have been below our own expectations.
Today, I wore a sweater, jeans, and a coat to work. It’s the middle of July. And the best part is that I don’t mind it one bit.
First of all I got my main materials together.
- Ben Nye Azalea
Other than these the cameras allow to use intermediate fractions, se we may have a time of 1/200 and one of 1/800.
But at some time you ask what does a 30-year strength coach’s career look like? It’s like asking what do a 20-year Cross Fitter look like? We don’t really know. And not only that, we ask, did we set ourselves up to be that expert in our respective field so that groups find us to use as a consultant? Have we developed a legacy or begun to develop that legacy so that we are in that position 20, 30 years down the road.
As I didn’t really workout at all yesterday, I did one of Ben Hanbridge’s interval training sessions: I think I need to work on my core strength too… Those planks hurt today and I got the body trembles. The cardio is great but maybe I need to do a weights session once a week too. After Fast Track 2 finishes, I shall prepare a new exercise plan and a new menu plan. I have to make sure I have strategies in place for when I accompany Nick to Fishing events from the end of this month onwards!
5. Cook almost all meals from scratch
As a kid I used to love reading these at junior school. Exotic, full colour photographs that took your breath away. As well as the superb photography there was also the opportunity to view bare breasted women from around the Empire. A fabulous combination of education and voyeurism. I was only 11.
Create a Critter Cricut cartridge
“Let Your Light Shine” “Let Your Light Shine,” in blue “Now Fish For Men,” painting John Knox graphic John Wycliffe Menno Simons Frederick The Wise Erasmus Martin Luther William of Ockham Jan Hus Calvin William Tyndale White Silhouette of Martin Luther “Enter through the narrow gate” Pro-Life Links Menorah, line drawing Menorah, second version
Let me remember
The smell of your hair, your pillowed head
Allegedly, because in the video we cannot see the blows. We can only hear Crook's screams and pleas, and hear Colling warn that he could deliver a "world of hurt." Please watch the video at the bottom.
3. The Bitch once ate for breakfast a literary agent who wanted to sell her fiction as autobiographical.
Under United Express agreements for SkyWest Airlines and ExpressJet Airlines, SkyWest recognizes revenue at a fixed hourly rate for mature engine maintenance on regional jet engines and SkyWest recognizes engine maintenance expense on its CRJ200 regional jet engines on an as-incurred basis as maintenance expense. During the quarter ended March 31, 2012, CRJ200 engine expense under these agreements increased $5.7 million to $21.5 million compared to $15.8 million for the quarter ended March 31, 2011, as a result of increased engine overhaul expense due to the timing of scheduled engine maintenance events. SkyWest was reimbursed approximately $9.4 million and $8.2 million for engine overhaul expense, under its United Express agreements, in each of the periods ended March 31, 2012 and 2011, respectively.
Deadline is Saturday, May 28th.
3. Drop out a comment in the shoutbox, tell us that you have follow those steps and provide your blog link (also, choose your desired link name. Tell us you're done :D . (example : Azreen Latip : Words Of Life, or My Blog)
Where’s Waldo. You know what. That’s a great question. Where IS Waldo?
This year, for the first time in India, design outfit Desmania, under the aegis of Procter & Gamble, organised a competition for innovative packaging ideas, Packinnova 2011. The company invited students from leading design institutes in the country to submit ideas on ‘packaging for small volumes’. So, the point is clear – packaging is gaining importance in India.
For years I told myself “I’ll love my body when…” When I’ve lost the weight. When I’m a certain size. Sure, I’ve lost weight before, and it felt great! I was even beginning to like how I looked. Especially when I was working out (I was beginning to have a great ass!)
Avocado: 1
I'm Trella. I'm a scrub. A nobody. One of thousands who work the lower levels, keeping Inside clean for the Uppers. I've got one friend, do my job and try to avoid the Pop Cops. So what if I occasionally use the pipes to sneak around the Upper levels? The only neck at risk is my own…until I accidentally start a rebellion and become the go-to girl to lead a revolution.
ScrapArtsMusic offers intricate rhythms, athletic choreography, and an inventive reuse of materials. Fashioned from industrial scrap and offbeat materials ranging from accordion parts to artillery shells, ScrapArtsMusic’s one-of-a-kind instruments are as visually striking as their music is sonically riveting. The band presents a mix of music, movement, and spectacle, fueled by the kind of creativity that produced projects like Blue Man Group and Stomp.
Mark Gelinas introduced this approach at our worship service on April 30th. We did it as a church, but we invite you to try this on your own.
It wasn’t supposed to survive. It did.
What is the point of an ultrasound? The only thing this could possibly be for is to wave it in the woman's face and say, "SEE? It's a BABY!" There's no medical need to do that.
Sweet Martini
That’s that on my end, friends! Now here are the last five questions for all of you.
When their sins were exposed, Bathsheba and David repented, but their child became sick and died. The scriptures don’t tell us much about how Bathsheba felt, but as a mother, she had to be devastated.
What’s going on?
'Her favorite game so far is Word Bingo and she is counting and writing letters and spelling words! My sister spent half the afternoon with her mouth hanging open in awe...Once she learns to read (which I hope is soon with the iPad), the sky will be the limit.
Nick Dunmore sees that some classmates are getting involved in something secretive. Even his friend Colin won’t talk about it though. Later he receives his chance to be in on the secret when Brynne offers him a DVD only if can assure her that he has his own computer in his room and that he will not show the disk to anyone else. Nick promises and the fun begins. He is completely addicted to the game just like the others. But why can’t he talk about it or even reveal his avatar name? More importantly, why does the game give him tasks to do in the real world and how does it know if he has carried them out? Because it does. And there are consequences for not completing an assignment. Erebos is watching.
6) Minute mashed potatoes really do only take one minute.
Back when the American whiskey industry was crashing in the 1970s, many producers joined in a race to the bottom and some stopped doubling to cut costs. Eventually, they all resumed the practice. As the distillers say, you can make alcohol without doubling, no problem, but you can't make fine bourbon whiskey.
He glanced to the clock again. He had slightly more than five hours before the process would begin.
And then it comes back to my remembrance, what I read in His book right there in Exodus. He took the children of Israel through the wilderness because He loved them and He didn't want them to be frightened when they saw war.
Mellie screamed and jumped back. “Branches don’t stand.”
I heard it's dead. Please form a band and play shows, people!!!
The other thing that could have been said, of course, is that Arianism is alive and well today – the so-called Jehovah’s Witnesses.
During each of the twelve days of Christmas, the 1709 Blog is bringing readers some information concerning an author, composer, artist or creator who died in 1941 and whose works fall into the public domain in 2012 in countries which operate a "life plus 70 years" copyright term. This series starts with the brilliantly gifted Irish author James Joyce.
At the edge of the town where the trains were all waiting,
I'd ask you why, but you'd only say "Because"
One of the essential aspects of the use of the Name of Jesus then is the “binding of the mind.” This is an expression used in the nineteenth century eastern spiritual teacher Theophan the ReCluse. He advices his disciples to “bind the mind with one thought – or the thought of One only.” It is this process of binding which is the purpose of meditation. What is meant by meditation? In generally been used to describe a way of disciplined thinking, an ascetic al exercise marked by discipline and sobriety. It involves pursuing one line of thought and renouncing all others. It is therefore a method of reducing the range of activity of the mind, allowing it to center on one point, to focus.
Other home remedies
Please see the buyer reviews of OCZ Z Series 850W Modular 80PLUS Gold High Performance Power Supply compatible with Intel Sandy Bridge Core i3 i5 i7 and AMD Phenom from the merchant’s website by click on the link below.
Ellie Mae has a way of squeezing her 70+ pounds into very tight spaces, including her favorite chair where she strategically watches the kitchen, dining room, driveway and street.
it was impressive.
The bring-your-own laws here are shocking to me, but they put out pint glasses for men, and half-pint glasses for women and children, per pub tradition, and people were using their own wine, beer, soda or water. I suppose readers from the UK will be wondering why that's odd, and Americans might be wondering "WHAT the Hell!?" And that's one of my favorite things about travelling, is the huge differences that never show up in the tourist literature or coffeetable books.
Well I have committed to doing this so I will but if last week is anything to go by whatever I plan will go out the window quickly. Between changes schedules, visitors and illness our plan went quite array but perhaps having a plan to fall back on is really the key.
I hear your voice on the line
And then put all the new pots on the clean window sill.
Before I share some of the details of the interview, here’s what the show is all about (from the show’s press materials):
Add to this, i have been a little negligent on here of late. Damn i hate it when i slack off like this. So i need to get things cracking back into shape. And what better way to do that is by proving you hearty fans with some wonder free music and stuff. Because as we all know, amateurs are killing it for the professionals and stuff, what with making music on their own terms and… just giving it away!
SCHLESSINGER: Yeah. I think you have too much sensitivity --
Stand (DT-29)
This place is unreal. The GPS lead us up the back way, no interstates at all hardly, nothing but winding two-lane roads through back country that got progressively more hilly, wooded and rural. Gorgeous stuff. And it's not done yet.
Loyal Outback fans, of course, still have the choice to order their steak prepared with Outback’s classic, Zagat® award-winning “seasoned and seared" grilling method - - seasoned with 17 savory spices and seared to seal in its juicy flavor. Regardless of the choice, each juicy, delicious steak is hand-selected, perfectly aged and hand-trimmed before being prepared and served.
I am terribly apologetic for having to contact you on this matter. South West Trains is never to blame for any disruption to its services and as often these are the result of weather conditions it would seem that God is to blame most of the time.
Inspiration for Kitty’s work comes from many sources including Story of O, Nine and a Half Weeks, and the work of Claudia D. Christian.
When the 16-year-old girl saw it, she said, "You have to eat all that?" and I said, "I GET to eat all that!" So here's what I did.....
Peter Pan by J.M.Barrie
The quarter finals continue tonight, Voice fans! On teams Blake and Xtina, some of the probable winners unexpectedly choked and were sent packing before the voters could save them, making the show way more interesting. Will we see similar upsets happen to the shoo-ins on Teams Adam and Cee-Lo? Let’s see….
Vigil final for you brave boy, (I could not save you, swift was your
I also passed my national exam...!
For the first time in years of living in Southern California’s nearly eternal Spring, I found myself wistfully musing over seasons, almost – but not quite – missing the changing of leaves, the onset of cooler nights, and Winters huddled inside, bundled up against the cold, with a pot of tea and jars of my own lemon curd and jams to remind me of the Summer that had past and which will yet come again.
I did like one part of the book, which is mentioned in the very last sentence on the back of the book:
The show is on a little bit earlier than usual this year so get caught and miss out.
I always think its time for lime but right now, limes are particularly spectacular. Big, fat and juicy. And I’ve been buying up big on them because you don’t have to re-mortgage your house to get a few. So what does one do with a mountain of limes? Make a Key Lime Pie of course.
Won’t take nothing but a memory
Goodreads/Shelfari: 24
Chicken feet are not that foreign to Americans and are mostly consumed in the deep south of the US. I have never tried them and I know no one who has, until now. I always thought of them as an oddity in the grocery, scrawny appendages, scaly skin, something akin to Yoda’s hands whirling his light saber.
The dream is always at night. I try to leave to go meet up with friends or run to the store… & my car is parked in the lot right outside my apartment… I end up hearing all the noise of the neighborhood & getting scared & try to sneak/run back inside my apartment without anyone seeing me and without drawing attention to myself. I always make it back into my apartment, locking the door behind me, then laying low so no one can see my shadow through the window.
2012 Morale Overall Chairperson
The truth, of course, is that I’m probably in an unfortunate minority. The chances are that most women in that room are being treated for a primary cancer that’s perfectly manageable, and so feeling daft about having a decidedly less hardcore treatment for a decidedly more hardcore cancer is about as dumb as it gets. It’s not like you can advertise that stuff, though. I mean, it’s just not the done thing to loudly wax lyrical about your diagnosis in such a scenario, and I haven’t yet been given a special membership badge that’ll explain away my presence. Plus, I can’t really meet every ‘what the hell are you doing here’ look with my secondary sob-story – it’s not fair on anyone concerned and, besides, it’d make me and my iPad look decidedly less flash. However
What could be better than a spring getaway with wonderful personal and professional learning opportunities for you?
Fair play!
At the Swissotel Chicago, guests will be able to take self-defense classes. Chess classes are also available.
I saw a handicapped man having trouble getting into the bathroom stall in "The Flowing Tide Pub".
Rhode Island
Love in rainbow gravity
During this time we recently moved into a new house. The house had an attic, but there was no stairway that let to it. One had to use a ladder and enter the hole in the roof of the third floor. The third floor also had a small room that had a hole at the back of the wall. I was convinced that this was a secret passage way to the attic. But I was scared. I was scared that I might get trapped, or something more scary was behind that wall, so I decided to trick my cousin Annika to do the exploring with me.
In 2010, there were 153 new posts, not bad for the first year! There were 965 pictures uploaded, taking up a total of 181mb. That’s about 3 pictures per day.
3. The kingdom of God is in a mystery form during this present church age (Mat. 13:10-11).
They are recruiting now, too. Think you have what it takes to join the Alaska Fire Service Hot Shot crews? Take a look here.
Wednesday: Take home final for Pre-Trial Litigation
Can you spot: * the Montreal Canadiens snowflake?
Coloring/Ink: Copic markers, Crackle paint and Memento ink (Rich Cocoa).
Science, colonialism, and indigenous peoples: The cultural politics of law and knowledge, is published by Cambridge University Press and authored by Laurelyn Whitt. The book's web page contains further information here. According to the publisher,
If anyone's interested in writing a few more verses, please feel free.
silently in the sand.
That was obviously a low point in our lives, but the outpouring of love and concern -- the way people went out of their way to come alongside us, the phone calls and notes I received from others who had gone through similar ordeals -- all of that sweetness made the bitterness much easier to swallow.
My Mom and I went on a date to Little & Friday cafe (Mon put me onto this cafe) I am such a baking snob (don't hate me) and this cafe bakes better than I do. It's AMAZING. And doesn't my Mom look good? We are nearing the end of the hateful chemo and I cannot wait.
No play involved, no dress code (this is a public place).
Business Moment by Moment
"Sleepy has been gone for a while," Charm noted once they were alone.
Once there, I wandered around a bit until I found myself in the chapel. Well, I thought, I will just kill the mobs in here and see if Alexa spawns. That used to be an hour plus event, so I figured I would run out my time doing that and then head to bed.
Majority of the white people in Europe have abandoned Catholicism due to which even on Sundays the churches in Europe are almost empty; instead of bothering about religious conversion activities in Asia &
I smell like stale smoke.
(Same as above and please credit other performers and troupes where credit is due in these acts especially if the original concept is not yours)
. . . that of all the propensities which teach mankind to torment themselves, that of causeless fear is the most irritating, busy, painful, and pitiable.
Washington Trust Bank next. They have a free checking account, so that’s good. Their office is located at Two Union Square 601 Union Street Suite 4747. That’s close enough to our apartment for me to check it out.
I thought I should put a happy post up. Lately my blog has been a sounding board for my many problems and I thought something fun would be great.
I like the back because of the full stats. But these eyes have no shot at being able to read them.
Every reader is going to get something different out of THE WICKED AND THE JUST. It’s going to be important in more ways than I can imagine. So here’s why it is important to *me*. At its heart, it’s a story about power and its exercise. Having power and knowing how to use it are two different things, and kids live in a world of uneven power that is uncomfortably hierarchical at times. The medieval world is similar, and I hope I capture that and make it familiar, relatable and survivable.
Part of Music on Main. Yes. Are you going to this concert? Are you? Hmm? How about now??? You should go! Where else will you hear cello and harp duo?
I would run into local wrestling talents Chris Havius, Shorty Biggs, Kiwi Jello and Dorian Victor . Local Promoters Herb Simmons and TNT Keny G was in the house while the legends made their appearance during the TNA Title match between Styles and Pope.
And you know how much I hate waiting around 'round 'round,
3/4 c chicken broth OR water
It was Ah-Maz-Zing!
Now, early Christmas presents! One of my bestest book buddies (and occasional bookshop visitor), Jess (of Jess Hearts Books) sent me a copy of Rick Riordan's The Red Pyramid, which I'm SO EXCITED to read! All the magic of Percy Jackson but with ANCIENT EGYPTIAN GODS! Awesome. And just to temper the chaos and violence, look at this beautiful little bookmark! Jess has a bit of a bookmark fetish herself, and this art deco-style amber butterfly is so lovely! Thank you Jess!
